S.  HRG.  110–1162 

OVERSIGHT  OF  THE  FISCAL  YEAR  2008 
BUDGET  FOR  THE  NATIONAL  OCEANIC 
AND  ATMOSPHERIC  ADMINISTRATION 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON OCEANS, ATMOSPHERE, 

FISHERIES, AND COAST GUARD 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JUNE  28,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

75–679 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  OCEANS,  ATMOSPHERE,  FISHERIES,  AND  COAST 

GUARD 

MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington,  Chairman 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine,  Ranking 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 28, 2007  ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Cantwell 
..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Snowe  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Lautenbacher,  Jr.,  Vice  Admiral  Conrad  C.,  (U.S.  Navy,  Ret.),  Under  Sec-
retary  for  Oceans  and  Atmosphere  and  Administrator,  National  Oceanic 
and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA), U.S. Department of Commerce 
...
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement  ...........
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  to  Vice  Admiral  Conrad  C. 

Lautenbacher, Jr. by: 

Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. John F. Kerry 
..........................................................................................
...............................................................................................
Hon. Bill Nelson 

Page 
1 
1 
19 
3 

5 
7 

29 

29 
44 
45 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

OVERSIGHT  OF  THE  FISCAL  YEAR  2008 
BUDGET  FOR  THE  NATIONAL  OCEANIC 
AND  ATMOSPHERIC  ADMINISTRATION 

THURSDAY,  JUNE  28,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON OCEANS, ATMOSPHERE, FISHERIES, 
AND COAST GUARD, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:09 a.m. in room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Maria  Cantwell, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Good  morning.  The  oversight  hearing  of  the 
Fiscal Year 2008 budget for NOAA, Oceans, Atmosphere, Fisheries, 
and Coast Guard Subcommittee will come to order. 

We’re going to hear from Vice Admiral Lautenbacher, but, before 
that,  we’ll  make  opening  statements,  for  any  members  that  would 
like to make opening statements. 

I’d  like  to  thank  all  of  you  for  being  here  this  morning  to  have 
this hearing on the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administra-
tion’s Fiscal Year 2008 budget. 

I want to thank Admiral Lautenbacher for being here today, and 

for your detail to attention on these important budget priorities. 

NOAA  has  been  in  the  spotlight  over  the  last  several  years  as 
the  Nation  has  paid  increased  attention  to  our  oceans  and  to  our 
atmosphere,  and  events  such  as  the  tragic  Boxing  Day  tsunami  of 
2004 and the hurricanes of Katrina and Rita have shown that bet-
ter understanding of our oceans and atmosphere saves lives. 

NOAA scientists have played a key role in understanding climate 
change  and  measuring  ocean  acidification,  two  key  environmental 
challenges we face in our country and around the globe. 

We  have  also  had  two  national  commissions  on  ocean  policy. 
They  have  made  recommendations  for  transforming  the  way  we 
manage, study, govern, and make policy on our oceans and marine 
resources.  More  than  half  of  all  Americans  live  in  coastal  commu-
nities, and an increasingly dense coastal population requires better 
understanding  of  how  people,  the  oceans,  and  the  atmosphere 
interact. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

2 

Tsunamis, sea-level rise, more intense hurricanes, and rising de-
mand  for  seafood  all  require  a  strong  Federal  investment  in  re-
search and new approaches to ocean governance. 

Quite  frankly,  Admiral,  in  the  light  of  the  challenges  I  see,  par-
ticularly as it relates to good information and the use of technology 
as an investment for NOAA to play that vital role in protecting all 
of  us,  I  am  concerned  to  see  a  flat  budget  request  from  NOAA  for 
the  third  year  in  a  row.  The  NOAA  FY  08  budget  request  of  $3.8 
billion  is  2  percent  below  2007.  The  National  Ocean—that  is,  the 
enacted  level,  I  should  say—the  National  Ocean  Services  took  an 
especially  large  cut,  21  percent  down,  from  the  $468  million  of— 
compared  to  where  it  was  in  2006.  In  contrast  to  the  Administra-
tion’s request, the Joint Ocean Commission Initiative recommended 
a funding level of $4.5 billion. We need to recognize that—the chal-
lenges  in  improving,  understanding,  and  management  of  our 
oceans and atmosphere, and the investments that it will take to re-
flect that. 

Admiral  as  you  know,  there  has  been  a  lot  of  attention  of  late 
to  our  rapidly  aging  system  of  weather,  hurricane,  climate,  and 
ocean monitoring satellites. We rely on this technology for accurate 
weather predictions, which is especially important as we enter hur-
ricane season. But these satellites are reaching, or have surpassed, 
their  expected  service  lives.  While  I  understand  that  NOAA  has 
made  replacing  these  satellites  a  priority,  I  am  concerned  that  it 
does not have the funds or a plan to—in place—to resolve this situ-
ation. 

Despite the growing threats caused by climate change, I see that 
funding for climate change research took a 9 percent cut this year, 
and  I’m  particularly  troubled  to  see  that  the  Abrupt  Climate 
Change  Research  Program  again  zeroed  out  in  this  year’s  budget 
request. I am pleased to work with Senators Snowe and Collins on 
an  amendment  that  we  had  in  this  year’s  energy  bill  that  would 
direct  increased  funds  to  NOAA  to  research  the  pressing  issue  of 
abrupt climate change. I hope this amendment will ensure that, in 
the  future,  the  Administration  will  stop  the  blocking  of  this  vital 
resource. 

This  year,  again,  the  President’s  request  for  the  Pacific  Coastal 
Salmon  Recovery  Fund  was  disappointing,  and—at  a  low  $67  mil-
lion. Between its establishment, in 2000, and 2005, average appro-
priations  to  this  fund  were  $87  million.  This  fund  goes  to  states 
and tribes who are on the front line of salmon recovery. 

And, Admiral, as we had a chance to discuss yesterday in my of-
fice,  I  think  some  of  the  proactive  work  done  by  a  collaboration  of 
interests  in  Washington  State—tribes,  fisheries,  agricultural  inter-
ests, water resource management concerns—have all shown, in the 
shared  recovery  plan,  more  effective  results  than,  I  would  say,  as 
another hearing that I chaired recently as a—the Subcommittee of 
the Energy Committee, on Energy Water Resources—on a San Joa-
quin  settlement,  after  many,  many  years  of  court  battles,  and  con-
tinued court battles, and continued court battles, a proposed settle-
ment. So, having the resources to do salmon recovery, and the will-
ingness  of  all  of  the  interested  parties,  although  they  have  con-
flicts,  to  work  together  in  advance,  I  think,  are  yielding  great  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

3 

sults. So, I hope that we will fund the Salmon Recovery Plan at its 
full need. 

I’m  also  disappointed  to  see  the  funding  for  NOAA’s  education 
program take a 50 percent cut. And, finally, I’d like to observe the 
Marine  Mammal  Initiative  that—the  Nonpoint  Pollution  Grants 
and the Marine Debris Removal Program were also zeroed out from 
this year’s budget. So, I look forward to hearing your comments on 
that, and working with my colleagues to restore that. 

I  understand  that  you  are  operating  in  tight  fiscal  times,  and  I 
appreciate  your  attention  to  the  juggling  of  those  issues,  but  I 
know  that—working  with  the  full  Committee  and  working  with 
Senator  Snowe,  that  we  still  have  lots  of  work  to  do.  And,  while 
I  won’t  go  into  detail,  there  are  many  other  issues,  as  it  relates  to 
the Northwest, that I just, if I have a chance, will continue to bring 
up—the  Puget  Sound,  Southern  Resident  orca  population,  and  our 
recovery plan, NOAA’s Pacific Marine Environmental Labs and the 
research  that  they  are  doing  on  both  acidification  and  tsunami  de-
tection,  and  making  sure  that  the  detection  program  works,  and 
works  effectively.  It  is  not  a  matter  of  whether  we  are  going  to 
have  another  tsunami  in  the  Northwest—we  will  have  one—the 
question  is,  how  well  prepared  will  we  be?  And  obviously  we  want 
to continue to work with a variety of programs through our univer-
sity system to make sure that we are ready for that. 

So,  with  that,  I  will  turn  it  over  to  my  colleague,  the  Ranking 

Member, Senator Snowe, for her opening comments. 

STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chair.  And  thank  you,  as 
well,  for  convening  this  hearing  today  to  have  the  opportunity  to 
review the budget request of NOAA. 

It’s been nearly 3 years since the U.S. Commission on Ocean Pol-
icy  released  its  final  report,  and  since  the  President’s  response, 
with  his  Ocean  Action  Plan.  And  some  of  those  recommendations 
have  been  implemented,  most  notably  the  reauthorization,  finally, 
of the Magnuson-Stevens Act, but we have much left to accomplish, 
and  our  success  hinges  on  securing  adequate  funding  for  existing 
and future ocean initiatives. 

I  want  to  welcome  you,  Admiral  Lautenbacher,  to  the  hearing 
here today, and to discuss some of the key programmatic and budg-
et issues that are confronting your agency. Your insight and leader-
ship  must  drive  our  Nation  to  improve  the  management  and  con-
servation  of  our  ocean  and  coastal  resources,  and  we  rely  on  you 
to ensure that these vital programs receive adequate fiscal support. 
Like  the  Chair,  I,  too,  am  very  much  concerned  about  the  level 
of  budget  requests  for  your  agency.  And  we  had  an  opportunity  to 
discuss that yesterday. But clearly it is a reduction. While—I know 
that it’s a proposal—the $3.9 billion request represents an increase 
of  3.4  percent  over  the  President’s  budget  in  2007,  it  still  rep-
resents a 2.5 percent decrease from the amount that Congress actu-
ally  appropriated  for  Fiscal  Year  2007.  If  Congress  were  to  enact 
the  Administration’s  budget,  we  would  see  a  net  effect  of  30  per-
cent decline in funding for ocean monitoring programs, such as the 
Nation’s  Ocean  and  Coastal  Observing  Systems,  a  47  percent  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

4 

duction  in  cooperative  fishery  research  programs,  so  essential  to 
our  industries  at  a  time  in  which  I  know  the  groundfish  industry 
is  struggling  in  the  State  of  Maine  and  throughout  New  England. 
Operation  of  lean  streamlined  ocean  management  programs,  I 
know,  is  an  admirable  goal;  but  these  reductions  are  more  than 
just trimming the excess fat, they cut to the bone of some of these 
vital  programs.  So,  clearly,  we’re  going  to  have  to  examine  these 
issues. 

The establishment of an Integrated Ocean Observing System was 
among the Ocean Commission’s top recommendations, and number 
six on the Joint Ocean Commission’s initiative top-ten list of prior-
ities  for  Congress.  I  sponsored  bills,  that  were  supported  by  the 
Chair, that have passed in each of the past two Congresses, to au-
thorize  such  a  system,  and,  just  yesterday,  our  legislation  was 
passed by the full Committee. 

Data  from  Ocean  Observing  Systems  alerts  mariners  to  haz-
ardous  conditions  and  contributes  to  weather  and  climate  fore-
casting that leads to vast cost savings. A study, in fact, by the sci-
entists  at  Woods  Hole  Oceanographic  Institute  estimated  that  the 
Gulf of Maine Ocean Observing System returned $6 to the regional 
economy for every dollar that was invested. The Ocean Commission 
recommended  initial  funding  for  the  Ocean  Observing  System  of 
$138  million  in  its  first  year,  escalating  to  a  half  a  billion  dollars, 
and yet, your 2008 budget request, $2.5 million for an office within 
NOAA,  and  $11.5  million  for  the  regional  associations,  is  barely  a 
tenth  of  the  Ocean  Commission’s  recommendation,  and  more  than 
33 percent less than the enacted funding level for Fiscal Year 2007. 
So  obviously,  these  are  issues  that  we’re  going  to  have  to  examine 
as we proceed. 

And  finally,  as  you’re  aware,  fishery  management  is  another  in-
tegral  issue  to  my  state,  certainly  to  the  Chairman’s  state  and  to 
this  country.  In  recent  years,  we’ve  seen  a  precipitous  decline  in 
the  catch  and  landing  of  species—whether  it’s  cod,  flounder,  or 
bluefin  tuna—that  have  traditionally  formed  the  lifeblood  of  our 
commercial fisheries. If we are to recover these stocks and to bring 
them  back  from  the  brink,  we  will  require  significant  investments 
in  fishery  research  to  ensure  we’re  using  the  best  available  data 
and science, and producing stock estimates that allow us to achieve 
the  maximum  sustainable  yield,  while  preventing  overfishing  from 
occurring.  Cooperative  fishery  research  has  proven  extremely  suc-
cessful  in  Maine,  bringing  scientists  and  commercial  fishermen  to-
gether,  not  only  to  collect  better  data,  but  also  to  develop  relation-
ships,  allowing  scientists  to  benefit  from  fishermen’s  knowledge, 
and  fishermen  to  see  that  the  research  is  being  carried  out  effec-
tively.  Cuts  to  these  programs  on  the  level  that  this  budget  pro-
poses, will certainly have a far-reaching impact on the development 
of  effective  regulations,  not  to  mention  the  ability  of  fishermen  to 
comply in devastating their own livelihoods. 

So, these are issues, Admiral, that hopefully we can examine and 
explore  in  greater  detail  here  this  morning  in  questioning.  I  do 
want  to  thank  you  for  the  $10  million  request  to  fund  an  unprece-
dented  dam  removal  program  in  the  State  of  Maine,  in  the  Penob-
scot  River,  that  will  restore  nearly  1,000  miles  of  habitat  for  the 
Atlantic salmon. This is a historic project, and I know it’s going to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

5 

produce  tremendous  dividends  to  the  species  and  to  the  State  of 
Maine.  I  think  it’s  a  great  model  for  what  we  can  do  across  this 
country  to  restore  different  habitats  and  species.  So,  I  want  to 
thank you for your leadership in that regard. 

I hope that we have the opportunity to discuss all of these issues 
and more, and thank you for your responsiveness and attentiveness 
to  many  of  the  issues  that  I  and  the  Chair  have  raised.  And  I’m 
looking forward to working with you. 

Thank you. 
Senator CANTWELL. Admiral Lautenbacher, thank you very much 

for being here. We’ll allow you to make your statement. 
STATEMENT  OF  VICE  ADMIRAL  CONRAD  C.  LAUTENBACHER, 
JR., (U.S. NAVY, RET.), UNDER SECRETARY FOR OCEANS AND 
ATMOSPHERE  AND  ADMINISTRATOR,  NATIONAL  OCEANIC 
AND  ATMOSPHERIC  ADMINISTRATION 
(NOAA),  U.S. 
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 
Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Thank  you  very  much,  Madam  Chair, 
Senator  Snowe,  distinguished  members  of  the  staff.  I  appreciate 
very  much  this  opportunity  to  come  before  the  Committee  to  dis-
cuss our Fiscal Year 2008 budget request. I particularly appreciate 
your  leadership  and  your  continued  support  for  our  programs.  I 
know  that  we  work  together  with  the  same  goal  in  mind,  to  im-
prove  our  products  and  services  and  do  the  best  for  the  American 
people. 

Before  I  go  into  my  short  oral  remarks,  I  would  like  to  request 
that  my  written  statement  be  included,  in  its  entirety,  in  the 
record. 

Senator CANTWELL. It will be. Thank you. 
Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Thank you. 
Before  I  give  you  some  details  on  the  budget  request,  I’d  like  to 
highlight some of our accomplishments, which I think are very im-
portant  and  represent  the  kind  of  work  that  we’ve  done  together 
to try to improve the NOAA performance with the public. 

First of all, last year the President designated the Northwestern 
Hawaiian Islands as a Marine National Monument. It’s now known 
as the Papaha¯naumokua¯kea. It encompasses 140,000 square miles. 
It is the largest protected marine area in the world, larger than the 
Greater  Barrier  Marine  Reef,  has  4,500  square  miles  of  relatively 
undisturbed  coral  reef  habitat,  home  to  more  than  7,000  species. 
For the first time in history, NOAA will play a leading role in man-
aging  a  national  monument.  It’s  an  exciting  and  important  oppor-
tunity for NOAA. 

NOAA  also  designated  essential  fish  habitat  area  covering 
150,000  square  miles  off  the  coasts  of  Washington,  Oregon,  and 
California.  The  regulations  under  this  plan  prohibit  fishing  meth-
ods,  such  as  bottom-trawling,  that  can  cause  long-term  damage  to 
the ocean floor, and are aimed at replenishing fish stocks. 

NOAA  has  greatly  increased  the  security  of  our  Nation’s  people 
living  along  our  coastlines,  through  a  combination  of  new  tsunami 
buoys  and  around-the-clock  warning  capability,  thanks  to  support 
from  Congress.  NOAA  now  has  28  special  buoys  around  the  U.S. 
Coast  and  around  the  Pacific  Coast.  Plans  call  for  this  U.S.  Tsu-
nami  Warning  System  to  include  39  buoy  stations  by  spring  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

6 

2008,  with  32  in  the  Pacific  and  seven  in  the  Atlantic.  There  are 
five  in  place  in  the  Atlantic,  by  the  way.  NOAA  has  achieved  full 
24-by-7 operations of the two—Nation’s two Tsunami Warning Cen-
ters  located  in  Alaska  and  Hawaii.  They  provide  warnings  and 
alerts  to  the  Nation  and  the  Pacific  Rim  that  are  now  serving  the 
Indian Ocean for the amount of—for the number of sensors that we 
have there. 

NOAA  collaborated  with  Federal  partners  to  place  a  NOAA 
weather  radio  in  every  public  school  in  America—that’s  more  than 
97,000 radios—to add in protecting our children. The NOAA weath-
er  radios  provide  automatic  alerts  for  severe  weather,  manmade 
disasters, such as chemical spills and terrorism threats, as well as 
AMBER Alerts for missing children. 

My  written  testimony  has  more  details,  but,  basically,  the  pri-
ority  areas  for  our  budget  this  year  were,  first  of  all,  sustaining 
critical  operations.  We  had  to  do  that.  That’s  number  one.  The 
other four items are—not in any particular order, but are very im-
portant: first of all, supporting the U.S. Ocean Action Plan, as indi-
cated in your opening statements; improving weather warnings and 
forecasts; climate monitoring and research; and critical facilities in-
vestment. 

The FY 08 request is $3.8 billion. It provides modest new invest-
ments  in  our  priority  areas,  while  maintaining  critical  services.  To 
sustain  those  critical  operations,  over  $54  million  in  net  increases 
to—will  support  our  workforce  and  pay  for  the  cost  of  doing  busi-
ness—regular inflation costs—to keep our core businesses and core 
operations  in  full  operation.  I  request  the  support  on  that  as  the 
top priority. 

Continued  implementation  of  the  President’s  Ocean  Action  Plan, 
which  is  the  response  to  the  two  committees  that  have  been  men-
tioned  in  the  opening  statement—is  a  priority  for  the  Administra-
tion.  The  2008  Budget  Request  for  NOAA  has  $123  million  in  in-
creases to support the plan over the President’s budget increase for 
2007.  This  includes  $60  million  to  advance  ocean  science  and  re-
search, $38 million to protect and restore marine and coastal areas, 
and  $25  million  to  ensure  sustainable  use  of  ocean  resources.  Spe-
cifically,  the  budget  request  includes  over  $16  million  for  an  Inte-
grated  Ocean  Observing  System,  or  IOOS,  for  development  of  re-
gional systems—this is the first time that we have had a line item 
to support that system—as well as improved data management and 
communications.  It  also  includes  $8  million  for  enforcement  and 
management  activities  in  the  newly  designated  Marine  National 
Monument in Hawaii. 

NOAA  is  actively  supporting  a  number  of  efforts  focused  on  re-
storing ecosystems in fisheries. The budget request, nearly $13 mil-
lion,  for  our  Community-Based  Restoration  Program,  and  through 
that  program  we  will  award  funds  to  build  upon  our  efforts  with 
local  partners,  such  as  in  the  Puget  Sound  area,  where  we  are 
working  to  restore  this  vital  ecosystem  and  the  fisheries  and  serv-
ices that it supports. 

The  2008  budget  also  requests  $10  million  for  the  Penobscot 
River  Restoration  Project  in  Maine,  as  mentioned  in  the  opening 
statements.  The  project  will  restore  a  run  of  over  10,000  adult 
salmon, 1.5 million shad, and roughly 8 million river herring to the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

7 

Gulf  of  Maine  and  beyond.  It’s  the  single  most  important  project 
that we have to support Atlantic salmon. 

To  improve  weather  warnings  and  forecasts,  our  budget  in-
crease—requests  an  increase  of  $5  million  to  support  operations 
and  maintenance  of  hurricane  data  buoys  and  research  on  hurri-
cane  intensity,  that  will  save  lives.  Over  $6  million  more  will  go 
in—go  toward  hurricane  modeling  efforts  and  hiring  employees  to 
support  the  newly  refurbished  P–3  ‘‘hurricane  hunter’’  aircraft, 
which increases our force from two to three. 

To  support  climate  monitoring  and  research,  NOAA  is  moving 
forward  with  an  increase  of  $3  million  in  funding  to  support  the 
use  of  unmanned  aircraft  systems,  or  UAS.  We  will  continue  to 
evaluate  the  benefits  of  using  UAS  to  conduct  long-endurance 
flights  for  weather  observations,  atmospheric  composition,  and  cli-
mate  monitoring,  and  gathering  critical  data  for  input  into  hurri-
cane models. 

The 2008 budget supports critical facility investments, with a re-
quest  of  over  $20  million  for  continued  construction  of  the  NOAA 
Pacific  Regional  Center  on  Ford  Island.  By  bringing  our  programs 
together  into  this  new  and  expanded  facility,  we  expect  to  realize 
benefits  in  improved  operations  and  mission  performance.  In 
March,  two  NOAA  ships  arrived  at  their  new  home  port  at  Ford 
Island,  with  a  third  NOAA  ship  to  follow  later  this  year.  Getting 
them  into  their  new  home  port  is  a  major  milestone,  and  I  thank 
Senator Inouye and other members of this Committee and the Sen-
ate who have supported these efforts. 

In  closing,  let  me  just  mention  that  there  are  some  very  impor-
tant  legislative  priorities  that  go  along  with  our  budget  for  2008. 
The  Administration  has  sent  Congress  draft  legislation  on  aqua-
culture,  coral  reefs,  and  hydrographic  services,  among  others.  We 
are  also  working  on  draft  legislation  for  a  NOAA  Organic  Act  and 
reauthorizing  the  National  Marine  Sanctuaries  Act,  Marine  Mam-
mal Protection Act, and Sea Grant. We appreciate the introduction 
of  the  initial  bills  that  I  have  mentioned,  and  the  support  from 
this—that  this  Committee  has  provided  for  these  very  important 
legislative initiatives. We wish to work together with you to ensure 
their passage. 

Thank you, again, for this opportunity to present the 2008 budg-
et  request  for  NOAA,  and  I’m  happy  to  stand  by  to  answer  any 
questions you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Admiral Lautenbacher follows:] 

AND ATMOSPHERIC ADMINISTRATION

PREPARED STATEMENT OF VICE ADMIRAL CONRAD C. LAUTENBACHER, JR. (U.S. NAVY, 
RET.),  UNDER SECRETARY FOR OCEANS AND ATMOSPHERE,  AND ADMINISTRATOR, 
NATIONAL OCEANIC
(NOAA),  U.S. 
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 
Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  before  I  begin  my  testimony  I 
would  like  to  thank  you  for  your  leadership  and  the  generous  support  you  have 
shown the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA). Your contin-
ued  support  for  our  programs  is  appreciated  as  we  work  to  improve  our  products 
and  services  for  the  American  people.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  on 
the President’s Fiscal Year (FY) 2008 Budget Request for NOAA. 

The  FY  2008  President’s  Budget  supports  NOAA’s  priority  to  advance  mission- 
critical services. The FY 2008 request is $3.815 billion, which represents a $131 mil-
lion  or  3.4  percent  increase  over  the  FY  2007  request.  This  request  includes  the 
level  of  resources  necessary  to  carry  out  NOAA’s  mission,  which  is  to  understand 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

8 

and  predict  changes  in  the  Earth’s  environment,  and  conserve  and  manage  coastal 
and  marine  resources  to  meet  our  Nation’s  economic,  social  and  environmental 
needs. At NOAA we work to protect the lives and livelihoods of Americans, and pro-
vide products and services that benefit the economy, environment, and public safety 
of  the  Nation.  Before  I  discuss  the  details  of  our  FY  2008  budget  request,  I  would 
like to briefly highlight some of NOAA’s notable successes from the past Fiscal Year 
(2006). 
FY 2006 Accomplishments 
President Designates Largest Fully-Protected Marine Area on Earth 

Recognizing  the  continuing  need  for  resource  protection,  President  Bush  des-
ignated  the  Northwestern  Hawaiian  Islands  as  a  marine  national  monument  on 
June 15, 2006. Encompassing nearly 140,000 square miles, the monument covers an 
area larger than all of our national parks put together, including 4,500 square miles 
of relatively undisturbed coral reef habitat that is home to more than 7,000 species. 
The  creation  of  the  largest  fully-protected  marine  area  in  the  world  is  an  exciting 
achievement and recognizes the value of marine resources to our Nation. 
Successful Launch of NOAA Satellite GOES–13 and New Satellite Operations Facil-

ity Ensure Continuity of Improved Data Collection 

On  May  24,  2006,  officials  from  NOAA  and  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space 
Administration  (NASA)  confirmed  that  a  new  geostationary  operational  environ-
mental  satellite,  designed  to  track  hurricanes  and  other  severe  weather  impacting 
the  nation,  successfully  reached  orbit.  Upon  reaching  final  orbit,  the  satellite  was 
renamed  GOES–13.  This  is  the  first  in  a  new  series  of  satellites  featuring  a  more 
stable  platform  enabling  improved  instrument  performance.  NOAA  instruments 
were  also  launched  on  the  European  MetOp-A  polar-orbiting  satellite  in  October 
2006.  Combined  with  NOAA  and  Department  of  Defense  (DOD)  operational  sat-
ellites,  MetOp-A  will  help  provide  global  data  for  improving  forecasts  of  severe 
weather,  disaster  mitigation,  and  monitoring  of  the  environment.  This  launch  ush-
ered in a new era of U.S.-European cooperation in environmental observing. 

In 2006, NOAA satellite operations and data processing groups began moving into 
the  new  NOAA  Satellite  Operations  Facility  (NSOF).  The  NSOF  will  house  the 
NOAA  satellite  command  and  control  functions  and  data  and  distribution  activities 
that  are  central  to  NOAA’s  mission.  The  NSOF  will  also  house  the  U.S.  Mission 
Control  Center  for  the  Search  and  Rescue  Satellite-Aided  Tracking  (SARSAT)  pro-
gram  and  the  National  Ice  Center  (NIC),  a  joint  NOAA/DOD  mission  to  track  ice 
floes and issue warnings to the Nation’s maritime force. The NSOF officially opened 
on June 11, 2007. 
Enhancements to NOAA’s Fleet of Ships and Aircraft 

Significant progress is being made in modernizing NOAA’s fleet. NOAA took deliv-
ery of the Fisheries Survey Vessel (FSV) HENRY B. BIGELOW, the second of 4 new 
FSV,  on  July  25,  2006.  The  BIGELOW  has  high-tech  capabilities  that  make  it  one 
of  the  world’s  most  advanced  fisheries  research  ships.  These  ships  will  be  able  to 
perform hydro-acoustic fish surveys and conduct bottom and mid-water trawls while 
running  physical  and  biological  oceanographic  sampling  during  a  single  deploy-
ment—a  combined  capability  unavailable  in  the  private  sector  that  will  enable  re-
search  and  assessment  to  be  carried  out  with  greater  accuracy  and  cost  efficiency. 
NOAA  also  took  delivery  from  the  Navy  of  a  ‘‘retired’’  P–3  aircraft  in  response  to 
the hurricane supplemental bill attached to the FY 2006 Defense appropriations leg-
islation.  Rehabilitation  of  the  P–3  is  expected  to  be  completed  by  the  start  of  the 
2008 hurricane season. 
Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Act Reauthorized 

Congress  reauthorized  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation  and  Manage-
ment  Act  (MSA)  in  December,  2006,  and  it  was  signed  into  law  by  President  Bush 
on  January  12,  2007.  The  MSA  is  the  guiding  legislation  that  authorizes  fishery 
management activities in Federal waters. Enactment of this bill was one of the top 
priorities of the U.S. Ocean Action Plan. The reauthorized MSA strengthens NOAA’s 
ability to end overfishing, rebuild fish stocks, and work collaboratively on conserva-
tion. 
U.S. Tsunami Warning System Improved 

NOAA  designed  easy  to  deploy  Deep-ocean  Assessment  and  Reporting  of 
Tsunamis  (DART)–II  technology,  which  provides  two-way  communication  between 
the  buoys  and  NOAA  facilities.  This  technology  allows  engineers  to  troubleshoot 
these  systems  from  the  lab  and  repair  the  systems  remotely  when  possible.  This 
functionality  can  minimize  system  downtime  and  save  money  by  not  requiring  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

9 

ship  be  deployed  to  make  minor  repairs.  The  U.S.  Tsunami  Warning  Program  also 
created  tsunami  impact  forecast  models  for  nine  major  coastal  communities,  pro-
viding  information  for  inundation  maps.  With  the  December  11,  2006  deployment 
of  DART  #23  in  the  Western  Pacific  Ocean,  NOAA  achieved  initial  operating  capa-
bility  (IOC)  of  the  planned  expanded  U.S.  Tsunami  Warning  Program.  NOAA  also 
achieved  full  24/7  operations  of  the  Nation’s  two  Tsunami  Warning  Centers.  Plans 
call  for  the  U.S.  Tsunami  Warning  Network  to  total  39  DART–II  buoy  stations  by 
mid-summer 2008 (32 in the Pacific, 7 in the Atlantic). 

NOAA  also  continued  to  monitor  sea  height  through  a  network  of  buoys  and  tide 
gauges,  collecting  information  critical  to  understanding  the  time  of  arrival  and  the 
height  of  tsunami  waves.  In  2006,  NOAA  completed  the  installation  of  eight  new 
National Water Level Observation Network (NWLON) stations to fill gaps in the de-
tection  network,  bringing  the  two-year  total  to  15.  The  15  stations  were  installed 
in  California,  Oregon,  Washington,  Alaska,  Puerto  Rico,  and  the  Virgin  Islands. 
These  and  other  new  stations  brought  the  NWLON  to  200  stations  by  the  end  of 
calendar year 2006. In addition, NOAA continued to upgrade the entire NWLON to 
real-time status by replacing over 50 data collection platforms. 
Red  Tide  Monitoring  Protects  Human  Health  and  Coastal  Economics  in  New  Eng-

land 

In  the  wake  of  the  2005  New  England  red  tide  crisis  that  forced  the  closure  of 
most  shellfisheries  in  the  region,  NOAA  provided  additional  emergency  funding  in 
2006  to  provide  timely  and  critical  information  to  state  managers  to  build  upon 
long-term  research  supported  by  the  Ecology  and  Oceanography  of  Harmful  Algal 
Bloom,  and  Monitoring  and  Event  Response  for  Harmful  Algal  Bloom  programs  at 
the Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution, as well as other partner institutions. In 
the  spring  of  2006,  NOAA-sponsored  monitoring  detected  rapid  escalations  of  the 
bloom,  which  subsequently  closed  shellfisheries  in  Massachusetts,  New  Hampshire 
and Maine. Additional NOAA efforts allowed New England managers to make more 
strategic sampling and shellfish bed closures/openings to protect human health and 
minimize the economic impacts of harmful algal blooms. 
National Estuarine Research Reserve System Adds 27th Reserve 

On  May  6,  2006,  Commerce  and  Congressional  officials  dedicated  the  newest  site 
in  the  National  Estuarine  Research  Reserve  System  in  Port  Aransas,  TX,  bringing 
the total to 27 reserves. This new reserve introduces a new biogeographic area type 
into  the  system,  and  adds  185,708  acres  of  public  and  private  land  and  water.  The 
reserves  are  Federal-state  partnerships,  where  NOAA  provides  national  program 
guidance and operational funding. These reserves serve as living laboratories for sci-
entists and provide science-based educational programs for students and the public. 
Wide Application Potential of Unmanned Aircraft Systems Demonstrated 

In  2006,  NOAA  worked  with  Federal  and  private  sector  partners  to  successfully 
demonstrate  Unmanned  Aircraft  Systems  (UAS)  technology.  NOAA  is  interested  in 
UAS as a tool to explore and gather data to help us reach new heights in our ability 
to understand and predict the world in which we live. Use of UAS could help NOAA 
achieve  our  mission  goals  and  provide  cost-effective  means  to:  enforce  regulations 
over  NOAA’s  National  Marine  Sanctuaries,  conduct  long  endurance  flights  for 
weather,  conduct  research  over  areas  that  pose  significant  risks  to  pilots,  validate 
satellite  measurements,  provide  counts  of  marine  mammal  populations,  monitor  at-
mospheric  composition  and  climate,  and  hover  above  hurricanes  and  gather  critical 
data for input into hurricane models. NOAA will continue to examine how UAS can 
assist in the collection of environmental data. 
Protecting Habitat Essential to Fish 

In  2006,  over  500,000  square  miles  of  U.S.  Pacific  Ocean  habitats  were  protected 
from  damage  by  fishing  practices,  particularly  bottom-trawling.  Combined,  these 
areas are more than three times the size of all U.S. national parks. The historic pro-
tections, implemented by NOAA with the support and advice of the regional fishery 
management councils, fishing industry, and environmental groups, made the protec-
tion  of  essential  fish  habitat  and  deep  coral  and  sponge  assemblages  a  significant 
part of management efforts to conserve fisheries in the Pacific Ocean. 
NOAA  Continues  Efforts  to  Assist  with  Gulf  Coast  Recovery  Following  2005  Hurri-

canes Katrina and Rita 

In addition to providing the forecasts and immediate response assistance in 2005, 
following  Hurricanes  Katrina  and  Rita,  NOAA  has  continued  to  assist  with  Gulf 
Coast recovery efforts in FY 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

10 

NOAA  ships  and  aircraft  provided  critical  response  and  recovery  capabilities  in 
the aftermath of Hurricanes Katrina and Rita. NOAA Ship THOMAS JEFFERSON 
completed obstruction surveys in the Gulf of Mexico so that busy ports and shipping 
lanes could be re-opened to traffic. NOAA’s Citation aircraft flew post-storm damage 
assessment  surveys  along  the  coasts  of  the  Gulf  States.  This  imagery  was 
downloaded on the NOAA website, enabling emergency managers, local officials and 
average citizens to inventory damage and prioritize recovery efforts. 

NOAA  mounted  a  multi-pronged  effort  to  address  fishery-related  impacts  in  the 
Gulf  of  Mexico  in  FY  2006.  In  August,  2006,  NOAA  awarded  $128  million  to  the 
Gulf States Marine Fisheries Commission to reseed and restore oyster beds and con-
duct  fisheries  monitoring  in  the  Gulf.  In  addition,  NOAA  Ship  NANCY  FOSTER 
conducted a seafood contamination survey for NOAA Fisheries near the Mississippi 
Delta  to  spot  potential  safety  issues.  This  research  monitored  the  seafood  coming 
in  from  the  Gulf  to  ensure  it  was  safe  for  public  consumption  (free  of  PCBs,  pes-
ticides, and fossil fuels). 
Collaboration  Enables  a  NOAA  Weather  Radio  to  be  Placed  in  Every  Public  School 

in America 

NOAA  and  the  Departments  of  Homeland  Security  and  Education  worked  to  get 
97,000 NOAA weather radios placed in every public school in America to aid in pro-
tecting our children from hazards, both natural and man-made. In many cases, local 
Weather Forecast Office staff provided expertise in programming the radios to select 
specific  hazards  and  geographic  areas  for  which  the  school  wanted  to  be  alerted. 
This  multi-month  effort  required  close  collaboration  between  the  Departments  of 
Homeland  Security,  Education,  and  Commerce  (NOAA).  This  effort  enabled  schools 
to connect to part of the Nation’s Emergency Alert System and greatly increases en-
vironmental situational awareness and public safety. 
World Ocean Database 2005 

NOAA’s  National  Oceanographic  Data  Center  (NODC)  released  a  major  upgrade 
to  its  World  Ocean  Database  product.  World  Ocean  Database  2005  (WOD05)  is  the 
largest  collection  of  quality-controlled  ocean  profile  data  available  internationally 
without  restriction.  All  data  are  available  on-line  for  public  use.  Data  are  available 
for 29 ocean variables, including plankton data. The database includes an additional 
900,000 temperature profiles not available in its predecessor. The database provides 
the ocean and climate science communities with research-quality ocean profile data 
sets  that  will  be  useful  in  describing  physical,  chemical  and  biological  parameters 
in  the  ocean,  over  both  time  and  space.  This  database  is  a  crucial  part  of  the  Inte-
grated  Ocean  Observing  System  and  the  Global  Earth  Observation  System  of  Sys-
tems. 
New Arctic Observatory Established for Long-Term Climate Measurements 

NOAA’s  Earth  System  Research  Laboratory  in  Boulder,  Colorado,  in  conjunction 
with  our  Canadian  counterparts,  established  a  research  site  located  on  Ellesmere 
Island to make long-term climate measurements of Arctic clouds and aerosols. This 
observatory supports NOAA’s activities for the 2007–2008 International Polar Year. 
NOAA Scientists Identify Carbon Dioxide Threats to Marine Life 

A report co-authored by NOAA research scientists documents how carbon dioxide 
is dramatically altering ocean chemistry and threatening the health of marine orga-
nisms. The research also uncovered new evidence of ocean acidification in the North 
Pacific.  The  report  resulted  from  a  workshop  sponsored  by  NOAA,  the  National 
Science Foundation, and the U.S. Geological Survey. 
First Operational Satellite Products for Ocean Biology 

In  June,  2006,  NOAA  began  to  process  and  distribute  ocean  biology  products  for 
U.S.  coastal  waters,  using  satellite  observations.  This  activity  represents  a  success-
ful  transition  of  NASA  research  to  NOAA  operations.  These  products  (e.g.  chloro-
phyll  concentration)  represent  the  first  satellite-derived  biological  products  gen-
erated  by  NOAA  for  coastal  and  open  ocean  waters.  These  products  are  useful  in 
detecting  and  monitoring  harmful  algal  blooms,  assessing  regional  water  quality, 
and  locating  suitable  habitat  for  fish  and  other  important  marine  species.  Develop-
ment  of  these  products  prepares  NOAA  for  generating  and  distributing  ocean  biol-
ogy products in the global ocean after 2010. 
FY 2008 Budget Request Highlights 
Supporting the U.S. Ocean Action Plan 

Coastal and marine waters help support over 28 million jobs, and the value of the 
ocean  economy  to  the  United  States  is  over  $115  billion.  The  commercial  and  rec-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

11 

reational fishing industries alone add over $48 billion to the national economy each 
year. The FY 2008 President’s Budget requests $123 million in increases for NOAA 
to  support  the  President’s  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan.  This  oceans  initiative  includes 
$38  million  to  protect  and  restore  marine  and  coastal  areas,  $25  million  to  ensure 
sustainable  use  of  ocean  resources,  and  $60  million  to  advance  ocean  science  and 
research. 

New  investments  in  ocean  science  are  aimed  at  monitoring  and  better  under-
standing marine ecosystems. Increased funding of $16 million is included for the In-
tegrated  Ocean  Observing  System  to  enhance  models  and  information  products 
through development of regional systems and improved data management and com-
munications.  A  total  increase  of  $20  million  is  provided  for  NOAA  research  on  four 
near-term  priorities  established  through  the  national  Ocean  Research  Priorities 
Plan. An additional $8 million will support exploring and defining areas of the conti-
nental  shelf  that  are  adjacent  to,  but  currently  outside  of,  U.S.  jurisdiction.  This 
work  will  enable  a  U.S.  claim  to  these  areas  and  the  potential  $1.2  trillion  worth 
of resources they are estimated to contain. 

The  FY  2008  President’s  Budget  builds  on  NOAA’s  strong  record  of  investing  in 
projects  that  embody  the  spirit  of  cooperative  conservation.  Projects  to  protect  and 
restore valuable marine and coastal areas include funding of $8 million for enforce-
ment and management activities in the recently designated Northwestern Hawaiian 
Islands  Marine  National  Monument,  and  $10  million  for  a  project  to  restore  nearly 
1,000 stream miles of habitat for endangered Atlantic salmon and other fish species. 
A total of $15 million is provided for the Coastal and Estuarine Land Conservation 
Program,  to  assist  state  and  local  partners  in  the  purchase  of  high  priority  coastal 
or estuarine lands or conservation easements. Increased funding of $3 million is also 
included to support Klamath River salmon recovery projects. Finally, an increase of 
$5  million  will  support  competitive  grant  programs  focused  on  the  Gulf  of  Mexico 
Alliance  coastal  resource  priorities,  as  identified  in  the  Governors’  Action  Plan  for 
Healthy and Resilient Coasts. 

Finally, the FY 2008 NOAA budget provides support to ensure sustainable access 
to  seafood  through  development  of  offshore  aquaculture  and  better  management  of 
fish  harvests.  The  Administration  will  propose  legislation  to  establish  clear  regu-
latory  authority  and  permitting  processes  for  offshore  aquaculture.  An  increase  of 
$3 million is included to establish the regulatory framework to encourage and facili-
tate development of environmentally sustainable commercial opportunities. In addi-
tion, $20 million in increases are provided to improve management of fish harvests, 
including  $6.5  million  in  increases  to  implement  the  new  and  expanded  require-
ments  of  the  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation  and  Management  Reauthor-
ization  Act  of  2006,  $3  million  for  observer  programs,  and  $6  million  for  market- 
based approaches to fisheries management. Market-based approaches—such as Lim-
ited Access Privilege Programs (LAPPs) that provide exclusive privileges to harvest 
a  quantity  of  fish—move  fisheries  management  away  from  cumbersome  and  ineffi-
cient  regulatory  practices  and  have  been  shown  to  lead  to  lengthened  fishing  sea-
sons, improved product quality, and safer conditions for fishermen. The Administra-
tion  has  set  a  goal  of  doubling  the  number  of  LAPPs  in  use  by  the  year  2010,  and 
the  increased  funding  of  $6  million  for  LAPPs  in  this  request  supports  that  goal. 
Finally,  an  additional  $2  million  in  funding  is  provided  to  meet  the  management 
challenges  of  assessing  and  mitigating  the  impacts  of  sound  from  human  activities, 
such as national defense readiness and energy exploration and development, on ma-
rine mammals. 
Sustaining Critical Operations 

As  always,  I  support  NOAA’s  employees  by  requesting  adequate  funding  for  our 
people,  infrastructure,  and  facilities.  NOAA’s  core  values  are  science,  service,  and 
stewardship,  as  well  as  people,  ingenuity,  integrity,  excellence,  and  teamwork.  Our 
ability  to  serve  the  Nation  and  accomplish  the  missions  outlined  below  is  deter-
mined  by  the  quality  of  our  people  and  the  tools  they  employ.  Our  facilities,  ships, 
aircraft,  environmental  satellites,  data-processing  systems,  computing  and  commu-
nications systems, and our approach to management provide the foundation of sup-
port  for  all  of  our  programs.  Approximately  $54.6  million  in  net  increases  will  sup-
port our workforce inflation factors, including $44.9 million for salaries and benefits 
and $6.6 million for non-labor related adjustments such as fuel costs. 

This year, we focus on the operations and maintenance of NOAA vessels and nec-
essary enhancements to marine safety, facility repair, and modernization. A funding 
increase  of  $8.3  million  will  be  used  to  support  marine  operations  and  equipment, 
including  $5.6  million  for  new  vessel  operations  and  maintenance  and  $1.7  million 
to  implement  a  more  effective  maritime  staff  rotation  and  safety  enhancements. 
This  funding  will  support  the  operations  maintenance  for  the  OKEANOS  EX-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

12 

PLORER,  NOAA’s  first  dedicated  Ocean  Exploration  vessel.  Increased  funding  of 
$5.5 million will support operations and maintenance for NOAA’s third P–3 aircraft. 
NOAA is also moving forward this year with increases in funding for unmanned ve-
hicles, with $0.7 million in support of Autonomous Underwater Vehicles (AUV) and 
an  increase  of  $3  million  in  funding  to  support  the  further  use  of  Unmanned  Air-
craft  Systems  (UAS).  With  this  increase,  NOAA  will  evaluate  the  benefits  and  po-
tential  of  using  UAS  to  collect  data  crucial  for  climate  models,  weather  research, 
fisheries enforcement, and coastal zone studies. 

The backbone of the NOAA infrastructure is our integrated Earth observation ef-
fort.  NOAA,  NASA  and  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  (OSTP)  serve 
as  the  lead  agencies  for  the  Federal  Government  in  developing  our  U.S.  integrated 
Earth  observing  strategy.  In  addition,  I  serve  as  one  of  four  intergovernmental  co- 
chairs  of  the  effort  to  develop  the  Global  Earth  Observation  System  of  Systems. 
Building and maintaining state-of-the-art satellite programs is an important compo-
nent  of  NOAA’s  integrated  observation  efforts.  An  increase  of  $25  million  in  the 
Polar  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  (POES)  program  continues  support  for 
development and acquisition of polar-orbiting weather satellites to improve weather 
forecasting  and  our  understanding  of  the  climate.  This  increase  will  allow  NOAA 
to complete acquisition of this series of polar satellites and install and maintain in-
struments important to U.S. Government interests on the European MetOp partner 
satellite.  Following  the  completion  of  the  POES  program,  it  will  be  replaced  by  the 
tri-agency  National  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System 
(NPOESS). This transition is expected in 2013. We will continue to partner with the 
Europeans  on  their  MetOp  satellite  as  NPOESS  replaces  our  current  POES  sat-
ellites. 
Improving Weather Warnings and Forecasts 

Severe  weather  events  cause  $11  billion  in  damages  and  approximately  7,000 
weather-related fatalities yearly in the United States. Nearly one-third of the econ-
omy is sensitive to weather and climate. Realizing this, NOAA seeks to provide deci-
sionmakers with key observations, analyses, predictions, and warnings for a variety 
of  weather  and  water  conditions  to  help  protect  the  health,  lives,  and  property  of 
the United States and enhance its economy. Increased funding of $2 million will ac-
celerate research to improve hurricane intensity forecasts through targeted research 
for new models and observations. Another $3 million will support the operations and 
maintenance  of  15  hurricane  data  buoys  in  the  Caribbean,  Gulf  of  Mexico,  and  the 
Atlantic  Ocean.  Finally,  NOAA  continues  to  strengthen  the  U.S.  Tsunami  Warning 
Program  with  an  increase  of  $1.7  million  to  deploy  additional  deep  ocean  buoy 
(DART) stations. Strengthening the U.S. Tsunami Warning Program provides effec-
tive,  community-based  tsunami  hazard  mitigation  actions  including  required  inun-
dation  flood  mapping,  modeling,  forecasting  efforts  and  evacuation  mapping,  and 
community-based public education/awareness/preparedness for all U.S. communities 
at risk. 
Climate Monitoring and Research 

Society  exists  in  a  highly  variable  climate  system,  and  major  climatic  events  can 
impose  serious  consequences  on  society.  The  FY  2008  Budget  Request  contains  in-
vestments  in  several  programs  aimed  at  increasing  our  predictive  capability,  ena-
bling  NOAA  to  provide  our  customers  (farmers,  utilities,  land  managers,  weather 
risk industry, fisheries resource managers and decisionmakers) with assessments of 
current  and  future  impacts  of  climate  events  such  as  droughts,  floods,  and  trends 
in  extreme  climate  events.  NOAA  is  building  a  suite  of  information,  products  and 
services  to  enable  society  to  understand,  predict,  and  respond  to  changing  climate 
conditions.  These  activities  are  part  of  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program 
and are being conducted in collaboration and coordination with our important inter-
agency partners including NASA, NSF, and the Department of Energy. We will con-
tinue to expand and improve access to global oceanic and atmospheric data sets for 
improved  climate  prediction  and  development  of  climate  change  indicators.  NOAA 
will  support  the  critical  National  Integrated  Drought  Information  System  with  in-
creases of $4.4 million to develop an integrated drought early warning and forecast 
system to provide earlier and more accurate forecasts of drought conditions. This re-
quest  also  supports  the  Administration’s  efforts  to  create  a  U.S.  Integrated  Earth 
Observation  System.  With  an  increase  of  $0.9  million,  we  will  support  research  on 
water  vapor  to  refine  climate  models.  In  support  of  the  Ocean  Research  Priorities 
Plan, NOAA will enhance our understanding of the link between ocean currents and 
rapid  climate  change  with  an  increase  of  $5  million  in  support  of  research  on  this 
topic.  Finally,  an  additional  $1  million  in  funding  will  provide  additional  computa-
tional support for assessing abrupt climate change. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

13 

Critical Facilities Investments 

The  FY  2008  President’s  Budget  Request  also  includes  important  increases  for 
critical  facilities,  necessary  to  provide  a  safe  and  effective  working  environment  for 
NOAA’s employees. Of particular importance this year is the $3 million funding in-
crease to begin design of a replacement facility at the La Jolla Southwest Fisheries 
Science Center. NOAA is also requesting $20.3 million for continued construction of 
the  new  Pacific  Region  Center  on  Ford  Island  in  Honolulu,  Hawaii.  This  increase 
in  funding  will  allow  NOAA  to  complete  the  exterior  renovation  of  one  of  the  Ford 
Island buildings, a crucial next step in the construction process. 
NOAA’s Legislative Initiatives 

We  appreciate  the  Committee’s  interest  in  reauthorizing  the  Hydrographic  Serv-
ices  Improvement  Act,  and  we  thank  Senators  Inouye  and  Stevens  for  introducing 
S. 1584 on behalf of the Administration. We support enactment of S. 1584, the Hy-
drographic  Services  Improvement  Act  Amendments  of  2007,  and  look  forward  to 
working with the Committee to reauthorize this important legislation. 

The  Hydrographic  Services  Improvement  Act  (HSIA)  was  first  enacted  in  1998 
and  amended  in  2002.  The  Administration’s  proposed  bill  to  reauthorize  the  HSIA 
was  drafted  to  better  ensure  safe,  efficient,  and  environmentally  sound  marine 
transportation, and to enhance and promote international trade and interstate com-
merce  vital  to  the  Nation’s  economic  prosperity  via  the  Marine  Transportation  Sys-
tem. The Administration’s bill clarifies the importance of NOAA’s hydrographic data 
and services not only to navigation but also to habitat conservation, coastal resource 
management, emergency response, and homeland security. 

NOAA  provides  the  Nation  with  nautical  charts,  as  well  as  information  on  tides, 
sea  surface  water  levels,  and  shoreline  and  geodetic  positioning.  NOAA’s  primary 
area  of  responsibility  for  charting  is  the  U.S.  Exclusive  Economic  Zone,  an  area  in-
cluding  3.4  million  square  nautical  miles  and  95,000  miles  of  national  shoreline. 
NOAA’s  hydrographic  and  shoreline  mapping  programs  deliver  precise  depths  and 
positions  of  coastal  features.  The  remote  sensing  technologies  used  reveal  hazards 
to navigation such as rocks, wrecks and changes in man-made features. To aid 21st 
Century navigation, NOAA is now building a suite of Electronic Navigational Charts 
comparable  to  the  paper  nautical  charts  for  U.S.  waters.  NOAA’s  tide  and  current 
measurements  along  with  Physical  Oceanographic  Real  Time  Systems  and  coastal 
ocean forecasts inform mariners about changing weather and navigation conditions. 
NOAA’s work on high accuracy positioning, using the Global Positioning System, de-
livers  centimeter-level  accuracy  to  navigate  hazards  and  avoid  overhead  obstruc-
tions,  such  as  bridges.  Should  an  emergency  occur,  such  as  a  hurricane  or  vessel 
collision,  NOAA  responds  rapidly  with  surveys  to  find  navigation  hazards  and  re-
open  ports  to  maritime  traffic,  and  with  scientific  support  for  hazardous  material 
spill response and remediation. 

The  purpose  of  the  Administration’s  bill  is  to  reauthorize  the  HSIA  for  5  years, 
and  make  changes  to  better  ensure  safe,  efficient,  and  environmentally  sound  ma-
rine  transportation  and  commerce.  The  marine  transportation  system  is  becoming 
increasingly  congested,  with  the  volume  of  international  maritime  commerce  ex-
pected  to  double  within  the  next  20  years.  The  programs  and  activities  authorized 
by  the  HSIA  also  play  an  important  role  in  the  national  response  to  natural  and 
man-made  disasters.  For  example,  NOAA  experts  discovered  the  submerged  wreck-
age  of  TWA  Flight  800,  took  some  of  the  first  aerial  images  of  Ground  Zero  after 
9/11, and provided a substantial and vital response to hurricanes Katrina and Rita, 
including surveying affected waterways to facilitate the reopening of 13 major ports 
to commerce and relief efforts. 

In  addition  to  the  Hydrographic  Services  Improvement  Act  Amendments  of  2007, 
the Administration, through the Department of Commerce, has also transmitted two 
additional  legislative  proposals:  the  National  Offshore  Aquaculture  Act  of  2007  and 
the  Coral  Reef  Ecosystem  Conservation  Amendments  Act  of  2007.  Again  we  thank 
Senators Inouye and Stevens for introducing these bills on behalf of the Administra-
tion, as S. 1609 and S. 1583, respectively. Enactment of each of these bills is a pri-
ority for NOAA and the Department of Commerce. We appreciate the actions taken 
by  Members  of  the  Committee  to  begin  work  on  these  pieces  legislation  and  look 
forward  to  working  with  you  to  enact  these  important  pieces  of  legislation  in  the 
110th Congress. 
Conclusion 

NOAA’s  FY  2008  Budget  Request  provides  essential  new  investments  in  our  pri-
ority  areas  while  maintaining  critical  services,  reflecting  NOAA’s  vision,  mission, 
and core values. The work NOAA accomplished in 2006 impacted every U.S. citizen. 
We  will  build  on  our  successes  from  last  year,  and  stand  ready  to  meet  the  chal-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

14 

lenges  that  will  surface  in  FY  2008  and  beyond.  NOAA  is  dedicated  to  enhancing 
economic  security  and  national  safety  through  research  and  accurate  prediction  of 
weather  and  climate-related  events,  and  to  providing  environmental  stewardship  of 
our Nation’s coastal and marine resources. That concludes my statement, Mr. Chair-
man.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  present  NOAA’s  FY  2008  Budget  Request. 
I am happy to respond to any questions the Committee may have. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Admiral  Lautenbacher.  And  I 
know  my  colleagues—we  have  a  busy  morning  here,  with  an  up-
coming  vote—but  I’m  sure  it’s  delaying  some  of  my  colleagues,  but 
they  will  have  the  opportunity  to  submit  questions  for  the  record, 
and, if you could help us in answering those, we appreciate it very 
much. 

I  wanted  to  talk,  first,  about  the  National  Weather  Service 
CONOPS program, which is the Concept of Ocean—I mean, a Con-
cept  of  Operation  Initiative.  Now,  I  understand  there  has  been  a 
lot of discussion and controversy around what was originally a pro-
posal to consolidate some of the weather service resources, that led 
some  to  be  concerned  that  that  consolidation  might  lead  to  less 
staff and less ability to track impending severe weather situations. 
Can you elaborate on where we are with that, and what the budget 
reflects, and what your management of that particular program re-
flects, as far as a priority? 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Yes, thank you, Madam Chair. 
I—as  soon  as  it—this  was  brought  to  my  attention,  I  initiated  a 
review  of  progress  on  that  initiative,  what  the  goals  were,  where 
it  was,  and  where  it  stood.  I  reviewed  it  with  independent  folks, 
and  looked  at  it,  and  we  have  since  stopped  all  work  on  that  pro-
gram.  I  believe  that  some  of  the  concepts,  at  the  beginning  of  it, 
to try to improve our products and services, were well thought out, 
but some of the issues that came up, in terms of trying to deal with 
it,  were  not  well  thought  out  and  constructed.  So,  it  is—has  been 
canceled.  I’ve  put  out  a  very  firm  directive  that  that  is  not  to  be 
discussed  in  the  terms  that  it  was  built  in  before.  We  are  commis-
sioning  a  study  from  the  NRC  to  look  at  expanding  technologies 
and  new  services,  and  having  an  unbiased  outside  scientific  body 
look  at  that.  We  expect  that  report  to  be  available  next  January. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  One  of  the  points  of  your  budget  request  is 
actually  a  plus-up  in  this  area—I  think,  about  a  22  percent  plus- 
up—but  I  think  that—I  don’t  know  if  that’s  a  reflection  of  that 
technology, but one of the things that have been pointed out in this 
proposed  consolidation,  I  think,  of  resources,  was  a  staffing  issue, 
particularly  for  over-the-night  observations.  And  I  think  what’s  at 
stake  here  is  that  minutes,  in  a  warning  system,  can  save  hun-
dreds of lives. So, we’re not—you’re sure that there is no continued 
discussion  of  programs  that  would  leave  some  of  these  severe 
weather  observation  programs  with  only  one  resource,  someone  to 
constantly do data entry, and leave less on the observation side. 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. I can assure you that, after years in the 
Navy, I do not believe in ever having one person on duty to do any-
thing.  So,  there  is  no  intention  on  my  part  to  approve  anything 
that  will  ever  cut  down  on  the  ability  to  have  viable  backups  and 
viable  forecasting  capability  on  station  24  hours  a  day,  and  that’s 
what I have told the National Weather Service. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

Senator  CANTWELL.  So,  just  to  clarify,  you  believe  in  acquiring 

15 

data, but also in having observation staff. 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Absolutely. Remember, forecasting is an 
art,  not  a  science.  It—the  forecasts  that  you  get,  from  hurricanes 
to tornados, come from forecasters, not out of computers. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you. 
I want to ask about the satellite situation and investment in sat-
ellite  capabilities,  moving  forward.  I  think  we’re  at  a  little  bit  of 
a disagreement, from a budget perspective, of where we need to go 
to implementing that. You and I also had a conversation about just 
the amount of information and responsibility already with weather 
and  NOAA  and  potentially  other  things  that  the  agency  could  be 
doing as it relates to climate change. But one of these opportunities 
means  making  sure  that  we  have  the  right  technology.  And  the 
geosatellite system that you have now, we’re concerned about mak-
ing  sure  that  we  have,  in  the  coming  years,  a  more  sophisticated 
technology  than  we  have  today.  So,  where  are  we  in  getting  that 
budget  request,  to  make  sure  that  that  upgrade  in  capabilities  is 
there,  not  just  for  today’s  responsibility,  but  for  what  we  think  is 
a potential for NOAA to play an even greater role in severe weath-
er change, climate change, and its impacts on the oceans? 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Yes, thank you. 
The  satellite  systems  that  we  have,  I  want  to  assure  the  Com-
mittee  and  the  American  public  that  we  have  satellite  systems  in 
place  today  that  are  robust,  complete,  and  have  backups,  and  are 
ready  to  support  all  of  the  needs  that  we  have  for  weather  fore-
casting, from tornados to hurricanes to flooding. 

We  have—there  are  two  main  systems  that  we  use.  The  one  is 
the geostationary system. There are two satellites in orbit that are 
relatively  new.  There  is  an  on-orbit  backup  in  that—in  position. 
There is also a secondary backup from a satellite that is still oper-
ating.  So,  we  have  very  robust  geostationary  satellites  on  station 
today.  That’s  the  most  important  piece  that  we  have.  The  lower- 
orbit satellite system, called POES, has on-ground backups, is oper-
ating today, and provides—that provides 90 percent of the informa-
tion that goes into our models for hurricanes and for other weather 
forecasting. That system is robust and working. 

We have requested from Congress, for the last few years, money 
to  support  the  next  generation  of  those  two  systems.  And  I  appre-
ciate the mark. I believe the mark that came in supports the devel-
opment  of  those  systems.  And  they  are  designed  to  come  online 
when  the  current  systems  run  out  of  backups.  If  we  can  continue 
the funding and the progress on the programs that we have set up 
today,  there  is  no  issue  with  maintaining  the  basic  satellite  cov-
erage and improving the position. 

Now, 

there  has  been  discussion  of  a  satellite 

called 

QuikSCAT—— 

Senator CANTWELL. But, without gaps in—— 
Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Without gaps. 
Senator CANTWELL. OK. 
Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Without gaps. There are no gaps in our 
basic systems. The plans and the money and all of the backup that 
we  have  sent  up  allow  us  to  continue  our  continuous  coverage  and 
improve technology for these two basic satellite systems. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

16 

The  issue  that  we’ve  seen  in  the  paper  recently  is  something 
about  a  satellite  called  QuikSCAT,  which  is  an  experimental  sat-
ellite  that  NASA  funded  a  number  of  years  ago,  which  we  are 
learning  to  use  in  our  forecasting  of  hurricanes,  at  this  point.  In 
the last year, our forecasters have come and said, ‘‘This looks like, 
really,  a  promising  technology.  We  would  like  to  pursue  it.’’  We 
started,  immediately,  to  look  at  ways  to  introduce  this  technology 
into our current system. We have, right now, spent money, as soon 
as we got it from Congress, to start preliminary studies, to look at 
how  to  incorporate  this  technology,  either  as  a  free-flyer—a  sepa-
rate  satellite  system—or  incorporated  into  these  two  systems  that 
I’ve just talked about. So, we’re very concerned, involved, and sup-
portive  of  providing  the  latest  technology  for  the  American  public. 

Senator CANTWELL. Senator Snowe—— 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Senator CANTWELL.—turn it over for your round. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Admiral  Lautenbacher,  in  looking  at  the  budget  again  it  does 
represent a major decrease and, as the Chair indicated, you’re talk-
ing  about  3  years  of  consecutive  decline,  so  it  really  does  have  a 
cumulative impact. 

If  you  look  at  the  inflationary  factor,  that  would  be  more  than 
6  percent,  when  you  compare  this  year’s  costs  versus  what  we  can 
estimate  for  the  future.  So,  how  do  you  expect  to  implement  your 
budget  programs  with  a  2  1⁄2 percent  decrease  from  the  level  en-
acted  in  Fiscal  Year  2006,  not  even  accounting  for  inflation?  Fur-
thermore,  in  looking  at  the  Joint  Ocean  Commission’s  Initiative, 
they  recommended  $747  million  in  funding  for  NOAA  above  the 
2006 level, which would be $4.6 billion versus the $3.9 billion that 
you have proposed, and that does represent a 2 1⁄2 percent decrease 
from last year. 

So, how do you expect that your level of funding will adequately 

cover the responsibilities that you are obligated for? 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Let  me  add  a  little  perspective  to  that. 
We  have  been  able  to,  each  year,  increase  the  President’s  budget, 
so our requests to Congress have been increasing. And this year it 
was  increased  over  $100  million.  And  that’s  an  important  bench-
mark. 

I realize—and I think we all realize—that, in the end, the budget 
is  a  compromise  between  what  the  President  requests  and  what 
Congress believes is the right level for funding. 

Now,  we  will  have  difficulties  with  inflation  and  cost  of  doing 
business,  and  I  don’t—I  can’t  dispute  that.  Part  of  the  reason  is 
that  our  actual  budget  that  we’ve  been  spending  has  been  capped 
at around $3.9 billion for the last 3 years, for a variety of reasons. 
But  the  good  news  is  that,  at  least  as  we’ve  been  able  to  find 
money  and  support,  working  through  our  programs,  we’ve  raised 
the level, which is very close to what Congress approved last year. 
The  marks  that  were  approved  this  year  are  actually  not  that 
much different. I think we are doing better, in terms of arriving at 
something that is a national consensus on the levels of funding for 
NOAA. I will continue to—as you all know, I’m an enthusiastic ad-
vocate of every program we have, and I will work hard to continue 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

17 

to try to get the funding to ensure that we can promote and provide 
the programs the public needs. 

Senator SNOWE. I understand. And obviously we’re in a cost-cut-
ting  era,  and  we  have  to  look  at  where  we  can  achieve  those  sav-
ings.  It  just  seems  to  me  that,  given  what  Congress  actually  pro-
posed,  over  and  above  what  the  administration  did  last  year,  the 
level  of  decrease  is  going  to  have  an  impact  on  some  of  these  pro-
grams,  without  question.  Looking  at  the  Ocean  Observing  System, 
for  example,  the  Ocean  Commission  recommended  $138  million  to 
initiate the National Ocean Observing System, escalating to a half 
a  billion  dollars  within  5  years.  And  I  recognize  that  that  may  be 
an  extraordinary  amount,  at  this  point  in  time.  But  your  request 
is for $2.5 million for the implementation system, and then, in ad-
dition, $11.5 million for the regional observations. 

So,  how  exactly  is  that  going  to  work  adequately  in  supporting 
this  system?  That  seems  to  be  a  small  amount,  comparatively 
speaking, to the Ocean Commission’s proposals. 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  It  is—it  is  a  relatively  small  amount, 
but  it  is  better  than  zero.  We—which  is  what  we  have  had  for  the 
last  4  years—we’ve  been  able  to,  first  of  all,  develop  an  architec-
tural  plan  that  people  will  support,  which  requires  a  great  deal  of 
effort.  We  need  to  have  regional  associations  which  are  fairly  con-
sistent in how they work together so we can have a national setup. 
And  I  think  this  takes  some  pressure  off  of  Congress  to  look  at 
extra funding—extraordinary funding mechanisms to help us move 
forward. It represents a beginning of a coalescence of agreement on 
the  need  for  an  Integrated  Ocean  Observing  System,  which  we 
know is strongly supported by the Ocean Commissions, and is now 
supported by the Administration. 

And so, I look forward to working with you in the future, and in 
this  budget,  to  try  to  improve  our  ability  to  bring  that  system  on-
line. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  I  guess  the  point  is  that  the  Administra-
tion  has  relied  on  Congress  to  increase  the  budget.  That’s  exactly 
what  we  did  last  year.  Now  the  Administration  has  come  in  with 
a budget that’s less than what we provided for last year. So, that’s 
the position we find ourselves in. Now, we do that year in and year 
out,  but  I  think  it  is  important  for  the  agency  to  indicate  what  is 
critical  for  more  funding  in  the  areas  that  it  requires.  The  Ocean 
Observation  System  achieves  savings,  in  the  final  analysis.  Report 
after  report  has  indicated  that.  We  saw  that  in  the  Pacific  Ocean, 
they  did  a  report  recently,  and  it  saved  a  billion  dollars  annually, 
and the Woods Hole study, which I mentioned in my opening com-
ments. The shipping industry saved, based on the report, $300 mil-
lion, by revising their weather-based routing system in response to 
the  real-time  data  that  they  were  able  to  get.  Not  only  from  a  fi-
nancial  standpoint,  it  represents  a  savings  to  the  government,  but 
also, in terms of lives saved, as well. And so, we have to make sure 
in this instance, that we give the kind of support to get this system 
underway,  particularly  now  that  we  have  the  authorization.  Hope-
fully, we can get it through the entire Congress. We have managed 
to  get  it  through  the  Senate  unanimously,  but  not  in  the  entire 
Congress. Hopefully that course will reverse itself. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

18 

I thank you for the support in getting it included in the agency’s 
budget, and I hope that we can do more to make sure that we solid-
ify this critical program for the entire country. It may be regionally 
based,  in  terms  of  where  the  systems  are  located,  but  it  is  to  ben-
efit  the  entire  country  and  what  we  can  anticipate  for  changes  in 
climate and weather forecasting and conditions. So, I thank you for 
that. 

New England groundfishing, as you know, is very critical. As you 
know,  we’re  in  some  extremely  dire  and  challenging  times.  And 
this  is  another  area  that  I  think  warrants  tremendous  support 
from  NOAA,  in  terms  of  investments  in  cooperative  research,  for 
example,  that  I  think 
is  absolutely  vital  to  serve  as  the 
underpinnings for any course of action that’s taken. Now, the New 
England  Fishery  Management  Council,  last  week,  decided  to  table 
proposals  that  could  have  replaced  the  existing  Days-at-Sea  pro-
gram,  or  at  least  examine  it.  I  don’t  think  the  industry  had—you 
know,  they  were  looking  at  different  proposals.  The  point  systems, 
for  example,  was,  you  know,  one  proposal,  and  area  management 
was another. 

The groundfishermen have an average of just 40 days at sea, and 
estimates  suggest  that  levels  could  be  reduced  up  to  an  additional 
30  percent  under  Amendment  16  in  2009,  leaving  fishermen  with 
just  33  days  to  make  a  living.  Well,  if  the  groundfishing  industry 
is in a crisis, that will become a catastrophe, without question. 

So,  I  guess,  what  I  am  concerned  about  is:  why  don’t  we  have 
any  existing  programs  within  the  agency,  given  the  magnitude  of 
the  impact  of  these  regulations  they’re  going  to  impose  on  the  in-
dustry, and people’s livelihoods? Why aren’t there any existing pro-
grams  within  NOAA  that  could  support  additional  research  and 
also  do  an  evaluation  and  examination  of  alternatives  to  days  at 
sea,  so  that  we  have  more  information,  better  information,  with 
which we can make these decisions? 

Now  the  Council  delayed  any  decision,  deferred  it,  because  they 
didn’t  have  enough  time.  But  we  don’t  have  enough  data,  and  I 
think  that  we  should  be  doing  everything  that  we  can  to  examine 
potentially  preferable  systems  to  days  at  sea.  Now,  maybe  there 
aren’t  any,  but  we  don’t  know.  And  when  you  get  an  industry  in 
a  crisis,  clearly  it  demands  looking  at  ways  in  which  we  can  find 
alternatives,  and  investing  a  sense  of  urgency  in  this  situation, 
that certainly could help other situations across the country. Do we 
have any programs that could help in this regard, in a timely fash-
ion? I’m not talking about years, here, because they’re now contem-
plating  Amendment  16,  in  2009,  and  they’re  devastated  as  they 
are. I mean, we’re talking about 47 days at sea. I mean, it has real-
ly been having a major impact on the industry. 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  agree  with  everything  you  said.  It 

does have a major impact, and it’s very important. 

We have, in this budget, about $6 million to look at the research 
and the needs to try to devise these kinds of programs you’re talk-
ing  about,  which  are  different  than  days  at  sea.  So,  this  is  an  at-
tempt to try to get more emphasis on it. 

We  have  a  commitment  to  try  to  double  the  number  of  what’s 
euphemistically known as the ‘‘Limited-Access Privilege Programs’’ 
across  the  Nation.  We  also  have  added  some  funding  to  increase 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

19 

the  scientific  staffs  of  the—or  access  to  scientific  information  from 
the councils so that we can expedite some of the groundwork that’s 
needed  to  do,  to  understand  what  those  plans  mean  and  how  they 
would be brought into effect. 

So,  I’m  just  as  interested  in  doing  this  as—in  an  urgent  fashion 

as you are, Senator, and we’ll continue to try to do that. 

Senator  SNOWE.  What  would  be  the  timeframe,  for  example,  to 
get  this  type  of  information  and  analysis  and  assessment  of  alter-
natives? I mean, because that, number one, is critical. Second, you 
know,  the  Council  indicated  that  they  had  to  table  their  decision, 
because  they  had  to  implement  a  decision  before  the  deadline.  Do 
we  have  any  flexibility  in  the  deadline?  That’s  another  question 
that  I’d  like  to  ask,  because  I  think  this  is  truly  having  some  dev-
astating  consequences.  And  we  want  to  look  at  other  alternatives 
to  see  if  there  are  any  possibilities  other  than  days  at  sea,  so  that 
we have examined an array of options, and we know what is avail-
able,  what  isn’t  available.  I  understand  that  $6  million  is  targeted 
for  the  Limited-Access  Privilege  Programs,  not  non-IFQ  programs. 
Is that true, too? 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. I’m sorry, I missed the last—— 
Senator SNOWE. The 6 million is—— 
Admiral LAUTENBACHER. It’s for—— 
Senator  SNOWE.—targeted  for  Limited-Access  Privilege  Pro-
grams, not non-IFQ programs. The $6 million that you referred to. 
Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Yes,  but  that  money  is—can  be—could 
be  used  to  try  to  work  on  alternative  schemes  to  what  we  have 
today. So, when I used that euphemistically—— 

Senator SNOWE. OK. 
Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.—that’s  what  I  mean.  So,  I  don’t—I 
can’t  give  you—the  Council  just  had  their  action.  We’re  going  to— 
we’re going to review it and see what—— 

Senator SNOWE. OK. 
Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.—we  can  do  to  help  them  get  the  re-
sources they need, because we would like them to get through their 
analysis  as  quickly  as  possible,  obviously.  And  so,  let  me  get  back 
to you—— 

Senator SNOWE. OK. 
Admiral LAUTENBACHER.—on what a—— 
Senator SNOWE. I would appreciate—— 
Admiral LAUTENBACHER.—timeline would be for the results from 

this latest action, which just occurred. 

Senator  SNOWE.  No,  I  appreciate  that.  And  you  understand  the 

urgency—— 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. I do. 
Senator SNOWE.—of the circumstances. Thank you. 
Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Thank you, sir—ma’am. 
Senator CANTWELL. Senator Nelson? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Madam Chair. 
Senator  Snowe,  we  are  going,  in  July,  to  have  a  hearing—and  I 
think  Chairman  Inouye  is  going  to  do  it  at  the  full-Committee 
level—on the overall question of the Earth Observing Systems, par-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

20 

ticularly  with  regard  to  the—with  regard  to  the  weather.  We  are 
trying to get that set for the date of July the 11th. And, with your 
interest  in  this  area,  if  you  could  be  there  with  us,  Chairman 
Inouye,  in  my  capacity  as  the  Space  Subcommittee  Chairman,  is 
asking  me  to  chair  the  meeting—and,  of  course,  with  Chairman 
Cantwell,  as  well—if  you  all  could  participate  in  that—because  it 
goes  far  beyond  just  the  narrow  question  of  space,  it  goes  to  some 
of the questions I’m going to ask right now of the Admiral. 

Admiral of course we’ve got the problem with QuikSCAT. What’s 
NOAA’s  plan  for—well,  let  me  say  what  QuikSCAT  is,  for  every-
body.  It  has  been  up  for  about  8  years.  It  has  a  4-year  life,  and  it 
has  lived  4  years  longer.  It  is  operating  today,  giving  us  wind  at 
the surface, which is a component of determining the direction and 
ferocity  of  a  hurricane—of  an  inbound  hurricane.  It  is  one  of  the 
computations  that  is  used.  And,  of  course,  from  the  satellite  posi-
tion,  as  opposed  to  a  buoy—a  buoy  would  get  certain  measure-
ments,  but  right  there.  But  you  don’t  have  thousands  of  buoys  out 
there. We tried to get NOAA to have additional buoys. The satellite 
gives  you  those  data  points  all  over  the  ocean,  which  then  go  into 
their computers that make up the model. 

So,  this  little  thing  is  like  the  Energizer  Bunny,  it  just  keeps 
going  and  going,  but  you  never  know  when  it’s  going  to  go  on  the 
blink. And, years ago, NOAA planned to have a replacement, called 
NPOES, N-P-O-E-S. NPOES was going to be many things to many 
people,  and  that’s  the  problem.  They  loaded  it  up  too  much,  and 
then  they  found  that  it  wasn’t  going  to  work,  and  it  got  delayed, 
it  got  overpriced,  et  cetera,  et  cetera.  And  now,  NPOES  is  some-
where in the middle of the next decade, like 2015–2016. 

So,  Admiral,  why  don’t  you  share  for  the  Committee—What  are 
NOAA’s  plans  for  a  replacement  of  QuikSCAT,  the  quick  satellite 
that is the scatterometer? 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Yes, thank you, Senator. 
As  I—let  me  just  mention  again  that  the  primary  satellite  sys-
tems that we have for weather forecasting or hurricane forecasting 
are  online  with  adequate  backups,  and  are  working,  and  plans  to 
continue these with increased technology are in place and on track. 
We  are,  as  you  mentioned—you  asked  the  question  about 
QuikSCAT,  which  is  the  experimental  satellite  that’s  been  put  up 
to  try  to  use  data  from  a  scatterometer,  which  you  mentioned,  to 
improve  our  hurricane  forecasting.  We  have  found  out,  in  the  last 
year,  from  our  forecasters,  who  have  spent  several  years  trying  to 
learn  how  to  use  the  information,  that  it  is  valuable.  When  we 
found  that  out,  last  June,  we  started  an  investigative  Committee 
to look at replacing or incorporating that technology, which was not 
the  preferred  technology  before  that  point,  into  the  next  systems, 
either  as  a  free-flyer,  which  we  think  is  the  more  interesting  op-
tion,  rather  than  incorporated  on  satellites  which  are  passive  sat-
ellites.  The  QuikSCAT  is  an  active  satellite,  which  needs  to  be— 
ensure that you don’t over-flood the receptors on the satellites that 
are passive receivers. 

We  have  put  in  place  a—as  soon  as  we  got  money,  we  put  in 
place a study with the Jet Propulsion Laboratory to give us options 
on  how  to  replace  the  current  QuikSCAT  as  quickly  as  possible. 
And that—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

21 

Senator  NELSON.  And  when  is  that?  We  have  a  limited  time, 

we’re going to vote on the cloture—— 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. I’m sorry. OK. We—— 
Senator  NELSON.—we’re  going  on  the  cloture  motion  on  the  im-

migration bill, so—— 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. We’re going to get—— 
Senator NELSON.—when are you going to have a replacement? 
Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  We’re  going  to  have  the  study  in  Janu-
ary  of  the  next  year,  and  then  we’re  going  to  make  a  decision.  If 
there’s  a  good—it’s—and  we  don’t  want  to  do—have  another 
NPOES, which you’ve talked about, so we’ve got to make sure that 
what  we  do  is  correct.  We  will  make  a  decision,  based  on  a  JPL 
and  the  expertise  that  we  get  from  the  reviews,  on  whether  to  re-
place that satellite with—as it is—— 

Senator NELSON. That a—— 
Admiral LAUTENBACHER.—or go to another technology. 
Senator NELSON. OK. But that’s a long way to get around to an-
swering  my  question,  which  is,  when  are  we  going  to  have  a  re-
placement? 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  It  will  take  3  to  5  years  to  replace  the 
satellite,  as  it  is.  Now,  what  I  want  to  mention  is  that  we  have— 
that  satellite  has  just—is  in  good  operating  condition.  We  just 
talked with Mike Griffin the other day. It—we expect—— 

Senator NELSON. Let’s—— 
Admiral LAUTENBACHER.—it to last another—— 
Senator NELSON. Knock on wood. Let’s hope—— 
Admiral LAUTENBACHER.—to 4 years, but—— 
Senator NELSON.—it keeps going. 
Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.—but  we  also  have  in  place,  in  orbit 
today, another scatterometer. It’s on the Joint U.S.-European Polar 
Orbiting  Satellite  System.  That  scatterometer  will  be  in  operation 
through the year 2018 to 2019. 

Senator NELSON. And does that scatterometer replace, fully, this 

scatterometer? 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  It  has  slightly  different  specifications 
on  it,  but  neither  scatterometer  actually  meets  the  needs  of  our 
forecasters. 

Senator NELSON. It’s—— 
Admiral LAUTENBACHER. It’s all below the levels. 
Senator  NELSON.  It  does.  Does  the  data  that  goes  into  the  com-
puters  from  the  QuikSCAT,  which  is  4  years  beyond  its  life—its 
planned life—does what you have up there now replace that? Does 
it  replace  it  by  half?  Does  it  replace  it  a  quarter?  What  does  it  re-
place? 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. We don’t—— 
Senator NELSON.—in the determination, at the end of the day, to 
get the data for accuracy for the National Weather Service and the 
National  Hurricane  Center,  to  predict  the  path  and  intensity  of  a 
hurricane. 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. We don’t know the answer to that ques-
tion  yet,  because  that  instrument  was  just  launched  a  few  months 
ago.  I  have  directed  the  Hurricane  Center  and  our  researchers  to 
take  the  information  and  start  putting  it  into  the  models,  as  we 
have had to do with QuikSCAT, to try to find out how much it does 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

22 

replace, or doesn’t replace. We don’t know the answer to that ques-
tion.  We  do  know  we  have  a  scatterometer  that’s  going  to  last  for 
another  10  years,  should  there  be  a  problem  with  the  one  that  we 
have  today.  We  are  also  looking  at  other  ways  to—and  remember, 
this  is  data  to  one  model  we’re—we’re  talking  about  model.  The 
forecast  is  done  by  forecasters  looking  at  whole  sets  and  varieties 
of information. 

Senator NELSON. Admiral, there is a huge debate in the weather 
community  over  what  you  said  is  accurate,  or  not.  You  are  rep-
resenting  one  point  of  view.  There  is  another  point  of  view.  You 
just  stated  that  it  was  going  to  take  3  to  5  years,  once  you  decide 
to build another replacement for QuikSCAT. You said, earlier, that 
you’re  going  to  have  a  study,  and  then  decide,  then  you’ve  got  to 
come  and  get  the  appropriations  here,  it’s  got  to  go  through  that 
process.  So,  we’re  in  hurricane  season  2007.  At  the  earliest,  we 
could get the money in 2008, and another 3 to 5 years, you’re now 
looking at 2013, if the decision was, in fact, made. And the question 
is,  Is  the  Nation  unprotected  by  NOAA  having  flubbed  the  dub 
with  NPOES?  And  are  we  in  a  situation  that  we  are  in  an  unpro-
tected position? And what are we going to do about it? 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  We  are  clearly  not  in  any  position  like 
that,  Senator.  We  have  very  good  satellite  systems  that  are  up 
there  today.  They  produce  90  percent  of  the  information  that  goes 
into  our  models  and  our  predictions.  We  have,  in  process,  a  set  of 
satellites that are going to replace those, that are working. NPOES 
is  on  schedule,  it’s  back  on  track.  Until  a  year  ago,  the  technology 
that  everybody  wanted  was  conical  microwave  imaging  to  get  the 
wind field on the surface of the Earth. In the last year, people have 
decided  that  maybe  the  scatterometer  will  work  better,  so  now  we 
are  looking  at  both,  we  are  going  to  build—we  are  going  to  build 
a  microwave  imager,  as  well,  to  put  on  the  NPOES  satellite,  and 
there  is  also  a  WINDSAT  up  there  today,  which  has  that  tech-
nology  on  it,  which  is  being  tested.  I’ve  also  directed  that  that  be 
put  into  the  models,  as  well,  to  look  at—see  what’s  going  on  with 
it. 

So,  we  have  a  number  of  backups  in  place  to  help  us  continue 
our  progress.  We—you  have  to  look  at  the  progress  on  hurricane 
forecasting.  It’s  improved  3  1⁄2 percent  year—per  year  for  the  last 
20  years,  because  of  a  variety  of  observational  inputs—and  thanks 
to  Congress  for  helping  us  for  those  inputs—our  aircraft,  which 
make up the most important part of determining the track, and our 
modeling,  which—where  we’ve  been  able  to  use  higher-power  com-
puters,  better  representations  of  the  physics  of  the  formation  of 
vortices  that  begin  the  hurricane.  So,  we  have  had  improvements 
over  20  years,  and  I  suspect  that  we’re  going  to  have  an  improve-
ment this year to—thanks to the buoy systems you’ve talked about 
and  the  new  instruments  and  the  new  aircraft  that  we’re  putting 
up, as well. 

So,  there’s  a  variety  of—defense-in-depth,  I  would  call  it,  from  a 
military point of view, that we have. And no one is unprotected, at 
this point, Senator. 

Senator  NELSON.  Admiral,  I  represent  a  state  that  cannot  afford 
a mistake, to have the very best data in accuracy of predicting the 
path  of  a  hurricane.  And  I’m  going  to  ride  this  one  hard.  There’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

23 

no excuse for NOAA and the other agencies to have goofed, as they 
have  with  NPOES.  NPOES  could  not  even  be  considered  before 
2015. If we’re going to get a satellite up—when, by the way, do you 
think  that  you  will  have  the  recommendation  and  the  plan  for  re-
placing QuikSCAT? When can you come to the Congress so that we 
can go to work on that? 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. I’m hoping that we can have something 
for  the  2009  budget.  And  I  have  enough  money  to  continue  that 
process  to  ensure  that  we  can  make  a—what  I  would  call  a  rea-
soned  decision  that  we’re  not  wasting  money,  and  we’re  providing 
the best protection that we can get. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Madam Chairman. And let me just 
say that I can’t tell you the intensity—Admiral, you and I have dis-
cussed  this  privately—I’ve  shared  with  you,  privately,—the  inten-
sity of the feeling of the people that live in the path of a hurricane 
to have the most reliable and accurate data. 

Thank you, Madam Chair. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  thank  you,  Senator  Nelson,  for  your 
line  of  questioning  and  for  arranging  for  a  full-Committee  hearing 
on this. Prior to you arriving, both of us—Senator Snowe and I had 
brought  this  issue  up.  Admiral  Lautenbacher  assured  us  that  we 
weren’t going to see any gap in service during that time period. So, 
I  think  having  a  much  more  illuminating  hearing,  just  specifically 
about  the  technology,  is  vitally  important.  We  want  to  make  sure 
that not only is it the right technology and robust enough, that its 
deployment is at a time and an implementation that does leave no 
gap in service. 

So,  we  will  look  forward  to  participating  in  that,  I  believe,  July 

7—or—— 

sion on that. 

Senator NELSON. It’s the eleventh. 
Senator  CANTWELL.—the  eleventh—July  11  hearing,  and  discus-

And, plus, I also believe that the implementation and technology 
decisions,  given  tight  budget  times—we  can’t  make  mistakes,  ei-
ther,  in  finding  out  later  that  there  was  something  that  was  more 
robust—leaves us without the ability to go back and make that ac-
quisition, too. So, let’s make sure we’re getting it right and getting 
it implemented. And so, I applaud you for your concern. 

Admiral  Lautenbacher,  if  I  could  go  through  a  couple  of  other 
issues. You and I had a chance to talk, in my office, about the Tsu-
nami  Warning  System  and  its  buoys  and  its  upgrades,  and  I  will 
not  go  further  on  that,  although  I  think  we  probably  will  have 
some  more  conversations,  to  make  sure  that  that  system  is  reach-
ing  its—with  the  second  version  of  deployment  of  what  I’m  calling 
‘‘smart  tsunami  buoys’’—reaching  its  achieved  performance,  and 
that  we  aren’t  seeing,  again,  gaps  in—or,  let’s  say,  breakdowns  in 
buoys  that  have  been  deployed,  and  then  aren’t  working,  and  then 
aren’t giving communication and data back. So—but, at some point, 
maybe  you  and  I—we  can  have,  in  a—follow-up  written  questions, 
answers to that. 

But  radar  is  an  important  issue.  And  can  you  explain  why  the 
coastal regions of Washington and Oregon have significantly worse 
radar coverage than the rest of the continental United States? And 
what  can  we  do  to  protect  the  fishermen  in  those  areas  who  are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

24 

obviously  practicing  their  trade  and  rely  on  that  important  system 
for information? 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. There are radar shadows, obviously, on 
the  Pacific—on  the  Olympic  Peninsula  Coasts.  So,  while  we  have 
radar  coverage,  they  are  altitude-limited  by  the  shadows  that  the 
mountains cast. 

Our systems were set up to cover what I would call the most pop-
ulated,  important  areas  of  where  people—most  of  the  people  live, 
and  where  our  airports  are.  So,  there  are  some  places  that  don’t 
have  complete  coverage.  The  options  could  be  smaller  radar  sys-
tems, such as the weather channels use today, to put in place, that 
have  smaller  coverage.  That’s  about  the  only  thing  that  could  be 
done,  at  this  point,  is  to  have  some  kind  of  another  radar  system 
put in place for a smaller area, beyond the shadow of those moun-
tains. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  And  that’s  something  that  NOAA  could  do 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  We  do  not  have  that  planned  in  our 

within its budget? 

budget, at this point, no. 

Senator CANTWELL. Well, I think we need to look at making sure 
that  there  aren’t  gaps  in  service,  particularly  in—we  don’t,  in  the 
Northwest, have as severe a weather forecast as my colleague from 
Florida  was  talking  about,  but  I  think  we  need  to  understand 
where  there  are  gaps  in  services,  and  how  those  are  being  met 
with,  and,  I  think,  figuring  out  whether  smaller  systems  can  add 
to  full  coverage.  So,  we’ll  look  forward  to  trying  to  resolve  that 
issue with you. 

I  see  many  participants  from  the  salmon  recovery  efforts  in  the 
Northwest  in  the  audience,  and  wanted  to  ask  you  about  the  pro-
posed  plan  to  meet  the  BiOp—the  Federal  BiOp  requirements  on 
endangered  salmon  and  steelhead,  and  to  make  sure  that  we  are 
going  to  continue  to  execute  that  plan,  working  with  a  variety  of 
parties.  I  know  that  you’ve  submitted  a  preliminary  plan.  Obvi-
ously, we have a Federal court review, wanting to see that we have 
an  adequate  plan  on  salmon  recovery,  or  we’re  going  to  end  up 
back in the courts on this issue. So, how are we proceeding in mak-
ing  sure  that  all  parties  are  participants  in  the  development  of 
what will meet a Federal standard for salmon recovery? 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. We have funding to continue to support 
our partnership with the various entities in the Northwest, and we 
continue to work on the BiOp that we have to ensure that we can— 
and we’re looking at the Congressional review after the late—or ju-
dicial  review  after  the  latest  Supreme  Court  decision.  This  con-
tinues to be an extremely important facet of our Northwest issues, 
and  we  will  continue  to  work  to  provide  whatever  funding  we  can 
in the partnership, and develop recovery plans, and meet the needs 
of the recovery plan. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  I  think  you  just  said  the  optimum  words, 
though. With the reduced funding, do you think that you can meet 
and come up with a plan that will meet—— 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. I—— 
Senator  CANTWELL.—Federal  requirements?  That’s  my  question. 
Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Yes.  I  believe  we  have  enough  funding 
in our budget to meet the requirements that will come up, and—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

25 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Even  though  we’ve  seen  a  significant  de-

crease in those funds in the last several years. 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  And  I  would—I  don’t—I  hesitate  to 
point  out  that  that  was—that  cut  was  originated  by  Congress, 
originally, so it was very hard for me to go back and get any more 
money  in  the  Salmon  Recovery  Fund,  if  you’re—if  that’s  what 
you’re  talking  about,  the  State  money  that’s  distributed.  So,  we 
have been able to meet—— 

Senator  CANTWELL.  I’m  talking  about  overall  budget  requests, 

from where they’ve been, say, over 7–8 years. 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  The  Salmon  Recovery  Fund  is  at  the 
levels that Congress set it at a couple of years ago, and it continues 
to be supported at those levels. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  I  think  that  there’s  a  difference  of  numbers, 

but we’ll get back to you—— 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. OK. 
Senator  CANTWELL.—as  it  relates  to—it’s  been  historically  fund-
ed  at  a  much  higher  rate  than  we  are  currently  funding  it  at,  and 
my  point  is  that  the—below  historical  lows,  that—the  question  is, 
what  does  it  take  for  us  to  meet  that  Federal  mandate  on  coming 
up with a concrete plan?—or we’ll be back to a much more aggres-
sive  Federal  process  for  salmon  recovery.  I  think  that,  as  I  men-
tioned in—earlier, that things are working well with a collaborative 
effort, but they need to have the resources, at the local level, to im-
plement that plan. So? 

We are looking forward to seeing your recovery plan for the orca 
whale  population.  Do  you  have  sufficient  funds  and  the  critical  re-
search information to provide that? And when will we see that par-
ticular recovery proposal? 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. We do believe there is sufficient money 
to  complete  that  recovery  proposal.  We’re  expecting  that  it  will  be 
finalized by the end of this year. 

Senator CANTWELL. The integration of that plan with other Fed-
eral  agencies—I  understand  that  the  Navy  is  planning  an  exercise 
off  the  coast,  to  test  their  sonar  capabilities.  In  the  past,  we  have 
seen that those sonar capabilities have an impact on the orca popu-
lation.  Will  your  mitigation  plan  include  discussion  and  rec-
ommendations on the Navy’s sonar system? 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  can’t  sit  here  and  prejudge  what  the 

exact plan will look like, but I can—— 

Senator CANTWELL. But will it—— 
Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.—assure  you  that  it  is  taking  into  ac-
count the issues of sonar transmissions, because that is part of the 
public record and part of what we’re going to deal with as we look 
at the plan. So, that will be specifically taken into account—— 

Senator CANTWELL. And you will—— 
Admiral LAUTENBACHER.—in the plan. 
Senator  CANTWELL.—give  us  a  recommendation,  one  way  or  an-
other?  I’m  not  saying—I’m  not  prejudging  what  that  recommenda-
tion is, but you will address—— 

Admiral LAUTENBACHER. We will address it. 
Senator CANTWELL.—what have been the concerns of many about 

the sonar impact on that population. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

26 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  We  will  address  that—that  fact—di-

rectly. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  And,  last—I  don’t  know  if  my  colleague  has 
further—well, let’s—I know we have a vote, so I’ll let Senator Nel-
son jump in, here. 

Senator  NELSON.  Admiral,  on  a  different  subject,  the  NOAA 
budget  cut  the  research  on  red  tide  from  $21  million  to  $10  mil-
lion—$21 million was back in 2005, and it’s down to $10 million— 
in  extramural  research.  We’ve  had  a  phenomenon,  the  last  several 
years,  particularly  on  the  west  coast  of  Florida,  of  enormous  prob-
lem  with  all  kinds  of  physical,  medical  effects  on  people  from  the 
red  tide.  And  I  want  to  know  if  there’s  any  way,  in  these  harmful 
algal blooms, that we can get that research up. 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  The  harmful  algal  bloom  budget,  and 
the program, is very important to us. We have a number of efforts 
going  on—in  west  Florida,  in  particular—to  try  to  deal  with  it.  I 
believe  our  budget  that  we  have  today  can  continue  those  efforts. 
We  have  been  given  some  funds,  occasionally  over  the  years,  on 
special  projects  that  Congress  has  considered  very  important,  and, 
obviously,  we  want  to  work  with  you  on—in  any  way  we  can  deal 
with  those  issues.  But  we  have  funds  in  there  today  to  help  con-
tinue  the  program.  We  have—first  of  all,  we  put  out  month—or 
weekly  bulletins  to  all  the  managers  up  and  down  the  coast.  We 
provide ‘‘harmful algal bloom’’ forecasts. So, we’re at the point now 
where  we  can  tell  people  when  it’s  going  to  happen,  warn  people. 
We also have programs that are looking at the research onto what 
it takes to find out how they got started, to begin with, the causes, 
and  then  look  at  trying  to  mitigate  that  in  some  way,  so  we  can 
eventually  work  to  the  process  where  we  don’t  have  these  things. 
But  that’s  going  to  require  more  in-depth  research  for  the  causes 
and  for  mitigation  effects.  But  there  are  several  projects  that  are 
funded in the budget that will do that. 

We  also  look  to  expanding  these  ‘‘harmful  algal  bloom’’  forecasts 
throughout the Gulf into the Texas region, as well, given—with the 
funding that we have. 

Senator  NELSON.  So,  you  want  to  stick  with  the  $10  million  in 

that extramural research, instead of increasing. 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I’m  here  to  support  the  President’s 

budget, Senator. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Admiral  Lautenbacher,  one  more  question 
about operationalizing climate change and the science and informa-
tion. How can NOAA play a larger role on that? 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  think  that  there  is  a  need  to  have 
what  I  would  call  definitive  climate  information  from  a  source. 
There has been much talk over the years about a National Climate 
Service  and  what  that  would  entail.  I  think  we’re  matured  to  the 
stage—we didn’t talk about more of the satellite issues, but we also 
have climate sensors to put on satellites, as well. The climate needs 
to be defined in a way that we have reliable, verifiable government 
information  that  comes  from  one  agency,  or  whatever  is  decided, 
that is operational, that is something—this is the Government Cli-
mate  Forecast,  whatever  it  is.  Today,  we  have  a  consortium  of 
agencies  that  work  on  it,  which  is  important,  and  we’ve  done  a  lot 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

27 

of good work—with NASA, with Energy, with Agriculture, with In-
terior, with the Commerce and NOAA—working together on the re-
search  end  of  it.  What  I’m  suggesting  is  that  it’s  probably  time  to 
think  about  an  operational  component  that  provides  regular, 
verifiable reports, which are government data, in which I’m subject 
to  the  questioning  of  the  Committee.  It’s  open.  It  becomes  some-
thing that’s public record and can be believed and trusted by every-
one. 

Senator CANTWELL. And you think NOAA could play a larger role 

in that. 

Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  think  that  NOAA  is  certainly—would 
be  a  good  candidate  to  look  at  ways  to  work  on  this,  and  I’m  cer-
tainly always—I have been interested in this for a long while. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  thank  you,  Admiral  Lautenbacher,  for 
your testimony today and answering our questions. As you can see, 
the Committee members that showed up have very intense regional 
issues,  but  they  are  national  in  scope,  as  well.  So,  we’ll  look  for-
ward  to  continuing  to  work  with  you  on  this  budget  authorization 
legislation. 

This Subcommittee meeting is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:15 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
This  year  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  is  cele-
brating the 200th anniversary of the creation of its U.S. Coast and Geodetic Survey, 
or  the  ‘‘Survey  of  the  Coast’’  as  it  was  called  when  created  by  President  Thomas 
Jefferson  in  1807.  As  our  Nation’s  first  scientific  agency,  this  agency  provided  nau-
tical  charts  to  the  maritime  community,  and  laid  the  foundation  for  the  standard 
set today for safe navigation of our waterways. 

Ironically,  for  the  past  several  years,  the  budget  for  hydrographic  services  has 
been insufficient, and at the current rate, the backlog of surveying critical areas will 
not  be  complete  until  2020.  This  year’s  budget  proves  no  different.  Unfortunately, 
the  budget  for  hydrographic  services  is  simply  a  reflection  of  the  systemic  under-
funding of NOAA’s critical programs during the past several years. 

Senator  Stevens  and  I  have  been  longtime  supporters  of  NOAA  and  have  spent 
our  careers  working  to  improve  its  capabilities  and  advance  its  service  to  the  Na-
tion. NOAA is a remarkable, national resource, particularly when one compares the 
accomplishments of its missions against the agency’s budget. 

Whether  it  is  accurate  forecasting  for  landfall  of  a  hurricane,  or  weather  fore-
casting of early freezes, all of which have significant impact on personal safety and 
the  economy,  or  fisheries  management,  or  climate  research,  these  are  all  missions 
that  have  an  impact  on  society  today  and  for  future  generations.  Meanwhile, 
NOAA’s  budget  has  remained  stagnant;  specifically,  this  is  the  third  year  in  a  row 
that the NOAA budget reflects level funding. 

The Joint Ocean Commission Initiative released a report card earlier this year to 
assess how well we are collectively doing to implement the recommendations of the 
U.S.  and  Pew  Ocean  Commissions.  They  once  again  rated  progress  in  increasing 
ocean funding as an ‘‘F.’’ 

It is clear that we are at a crossroads. The growing number and severity of prob-
lems  compromising  the  health  of  our  coasts  and  oceans  is  obvious.  The  science  of 
global warming is clear. 

The delays and cost overruns of our satellites are unacceptable. I look forward to 
hearing  Admiral  Lautenbacher’s  assessment  of  how  all  of  these  developing  needs 
can be addressed given current budgetary trends. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

VICE ADMIRAL CONRAD C. LAUTENBACHER, JR. 

General Budget 

Question 1. While I understand that you support the President’s budget, does this 
year’s  FY08  budget  request  give  you  the  funding  you  need  to  do  all  the  things  re-
quired of NOAA by Congress? If not, what do you estimate you would need? 

Answer. The FY 2008 President’s Budget Request provides a sufficient amount of 
funds for NOAA to carry out its statutorily mandated responsibilities while address-
ing our highest priorities. 

Question  2.  Admiral,  we  understand  that  the  appropriations  subcommittee  on 
Commerce,  Justice,  and  Science  marked  up  a  spending  bill  this  week  that  would 
provide NOAA with $4.2 billion for FY 2008. We further understand that up to $795 
million of this would be used to implement the recommendations of the Joint Ocean 
Commission  Initiative.  Can  you  please  tell  me  how  NOAA  would  prioritize  imple-
menting these recommendations? 

Answer.  The  priorities  outlined  in  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  are  NOAA’s  top  prior-
ities. NOAA is requesting a total of $123 million in spending directly related to the 
U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  in  the  FY  2008  President’s  Budget,  including  $60  million 
for  enhanced  ocean  science  and  research,  $38  million  for  protection  and  restoration 
of marine and coastal areas, and $25 million for sustainable use of ocean resources. 

(29) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

30 

The  increases  will  allow  NOAA  to  continue  to  implement  several  priority  manage-
ment goals, including vessel tracking and enforcement, and ecosystem characteriza-
tion  for  the  recently  designated  Papaha¯naumokua¯kea  Marine  National  Monument. 
Funding  is  included  to  implement  a  number  of  requirements  of  the  recently  reau-
thorized  Magnuson-Stevens  Fisheries  Conservation  and  Management  Act,  including 
improvements in data collection of recreational fishing information, and the develop-
ment of Limited Access Privilege Programs that provide exclusive privileges to har-
vest  a  quantity  of  fish.  The  President’s  FY  2008  budget  request  also  includes  fund-
ing that will allow NOAA to develop initial operating capability for regional compo-
nents  of  the  Integrated  Ocean  Observing  System  (IOOS).  To  date,  73  of  the  88  ac-
tions  from  the  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  have  been  met,  and  a  key  factor  in  imple-
menting the U.S. Ocean Action Plan actions has been NOAA’s commitment to invest 
in moving the plan forward. 
Satellites 

Question 1. As our current climate and ocean monitoring satellites age and begin 
to fail, how does NOAA plan to mitigate the loss of the critical weather-related and 
climate data they provide? 

Answer.  NOAA  has  a  continuous  planning  process  to  develop  its  next  generation 
satellites  to  provide  data  on  weather,  satellite  oceanography,  and  climate.  NOAA’s 
plan  is  to  provide  uninterrupted  satellite  data  through  at  least  2026  from  the  next 
generation  geostationary  satellites,  known  as  the  Geostationary  Operational  Envi-
ronmental  Satellite  R-Series  (GOES–R),  and  the  next  generation  polar-orbiting  sat-
ellites,  known  as  the  National  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite 
System  (NPOESS).  Through  the  NPOESS  and  GOES–R  systems,  NOAA  has  been 
working  closely  with  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA) 
and,  where  applicable,  the  U.S.  Air  Force  to  satisfy  requirements  of  the  National 
Weather Service, National Ocean Service, and the NOAA Climate Program. 

In  response  to  a  request  from  the  White  House  Office  of  Science  and  Technology 
Policy  (OSTP),  NOAA  has  been  working  with  NASA  to  identify  options  to  mitigate 
the  loss  of  climate  sensors  from  the  Nunn-McCurdy  certified  NPOESS  program. 
NOAA  and  NASA  requested  assistance  from  the  National  Research  Council  (NRC) 
Space Studies Board to assess the state of Earth observations, including the impact 
of  the  2006  changes  to  the  GOES–R  and  NPOESS  programs.  A  special  NRC  group 
of experts has assessed the impact on climate monitoring capability of the NPOESS 
Nunn-McCurdy certified program. NOAA and NASA are currently preparing a miti-
gation assessment for the Executive Office of the President. 

Question  2.  Does  the  current  state  of  the  NOAA  satellite  program  pose  a  threat 
to  our  ability  to  research,  monitor,  and  understand  climate  change  in  the  coming 
years? 

Answer. The current state of NOAA’s satellite programs does not pose a near-term 
threat  to  our  ability  to  research,  monitor,  and  understand  climate  change.  NOAA’s 
Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellites  (POES)  continue  to  provide  in-
valuable  global  data  to  support  climate  monitoring.  A  major  improvement  in  the 
quality  of  data  to  measure  select  climate  parameters  will  occur  with  the  launch  of 
the  National  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System  (NPOESS) 
Preparatory Project (NPP) in 2009 and the first NPOESS satellite in 2013. 

In  addition  to  using  POES,  NOAA  is  currently  making  full  use  of  National  Aero-
nautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA)  research  satellites,  the  Department  of 
Defense’s  Defense  Meteorological  Satellite  Program,  and  international  agency  col-
laborations to satisfy the climate data requirements. NOAA continues to work with 
NASA  to  implement  a  plan  to  minimize  the  gap  in  climate  data  record,  including 
preparing a mitigation assessment for the Executive Office of the President. As dis-
cussed in the joint NOAA–NASA July 10, 2007 report submitted to Congress pursu-
ant  to  Pub.  L.  109–155,  NOAA  and  NASA  are  examining  re-establishing  the  Oper-
ational Satellite Improvement Program to refine instrument requirements and plan 
for future NOAA operational missions that build on NASA research activities. 
Climate Change, Hurricanes, and Ocean Acidification 

Question  1.  Can  you  please  detail  specifically  how  the  proposed  9  percent  cut  to 
NOAA’s  climate  change  programs  would  be  implemented  and  specifically  what  pro-
grams would be affected? Why exactly were these cuts made? 

Answer.  In  FY  2008,  NOAA  has  requested  $239.8  million  for  climate-related  ac-
tivities. This figure is 8.3 percent less than the $261.5 million NOAA will spend on 
climate-related activities in FY 2007. It is important to note that the President’s FY 
2008  Budget  request  for  climate-related  activities  reflects  an  increase  of  $13.3  mil-
lion over the President’s FY 2007 request. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

31 

Examples  of  the  major  programs  funded  in  the  FY  2007  spend  plan  that  are  not 
included  in  the  FY  2008  President’s  Budget  include  approximately  $15  million  for 
satellite  climate  sensors.  The  Administration  included  this  funding  in  FY  2007  to 
maintain  some  options  while  evaluating  whether  climate  sensors  that  had  been 
demanifested (removed) from the Nunn-McCurdy certified NPOESS program should 
be restored. The Office of Science and Technology Policy (OSTP) coordinated a joint 
NOAA-National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  (NASA)  study  to  assess  the 
impact  of  the  demanifested  sensors.  NOAA  and  NASA  are  preparing  a  mitigation 
assessment for the Executive Office of the President. 

In  addition,  in  FY  2007,  approximately  $4  million  in  one-year  funding  was  in-
cluded  for  the  Integrated  Ocean  Observing  System  (IOOS)  climate  sensors.  The  re-
mainder  of  the  additional  FY  2007  funding  was  for  climate-related  grants  and  con-
tracts. The President’s FY 2008 budget also includes a $1.3 million reduction to base 
funding  for  the  Global  Climate  Observing  System  to  partially  offset  the  climate-re-
lated increases requested, and no other cuts to climate funding were made. 

• $20.5  million  for  drought-related  activities,  $8.4  million  of  which  is  specifically 
for  the  National  Integrated  Drought  Information  System  (NIDIS)  in  support  of 
the NIDIS bill signed by the President in December 2006; 
• NOAA’s  contribution  for  the  Climate  Change  Science  Program,  of  which  $46 
million is for programs that directly support the Climate Change Research Ini-
tiative; and 
• $11.2 million for understanding and predicting abrupt climate change, which in-
cludes  a  $5  million  increase  for  studying  the  Atlantic  Meridional  Overturning 
Circulation, i.e., the ‘‘ocean conveyor belt’’. 

The FY 2008 budget request includes $239.8 million for climate-related activities, 

and this figure includes: 

Question 2. Can you elaborate on what NOAA is doing to develop a clear, coherent 
strategy,  for  improving  our  understanding  of  the  science  underpinning  the  inter-
actions of ocean and climate? Will parts of this strategy address how we equip Fed-
eral,  state  and  local  managers  to  mitigate  the  impacts  of  climate  change  in  coastal 
areas? 

Answer.  The  Administration’s  U.S.  Ocean  Action  plan  provides  the  foundation  to 
advance the next generation of ocean, coastal, and Great Lakes policy. The National 
Science  and  Technology  Council’s  Joint  Subcommittee  on  Ocean  Science  and  Tech-
nology  (JSOST)  recently  completed  Charting  the  Course  for  Ocean  Science  in  the 
Next  Decade:  An  Ocean  Research  Priorities  Plan  and  Implementation  Strategy, 
which  presents  research  priorities  focusing  on  the  most  compelling  issues  in  key 
areas  of  interaction  between  society  and  the  ocean.  One  of  the  major  themes  of 
Charting  the  Course  for  Ocean  Science  is  the  ocean’s  role  in  climate.  In  particular, 
the  President’s  FY  2008  budget  request  for  NOAA  includes  $5  million  for  research 
to  assess  the  Atlantic  Meridional  Overturning  Circulation  and  its  role  in  climate 
variability  in  support  of  one  of  the  four  near-term  priorities  outlined  in  Charting 
the  Course  for  Ocean  Science.  This  research  is  an  integral  part  of  NOAA’s  strategy 
to  address  how  to  equip  Federal,  state  and  local  managers  to  mitigate  the  impact 
of  climate  change  in  coastal  areas.  This  request  will  support  the  development  of 
now-casting capabilities and experimental products critical to predicting the current 
and future state of the Atlantic Meridional Overturning Circulation as well as sup-
port  an  assessment  of  potential  impacts  of  rapid  Atlantic  Meridional  Overturning 
Circulation changes on ecosystems, regional sea-level changes, regional climate, and 
socioeconomic  systems.  These  capabilities  and  products  will  be  a  valuable  resource 
for understanding the impacts of potential abrupt climate change. 

The  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  Fourth  Assessment  Report’s 
Working  Group  II  report  entitled  ‘‘Climate  Change  2007:  Climate  Change  Impacts, 
Adaptation and Vulnerability’’ identifies several potential impacts of climate change 
on the people and natural systems of coastal regions as a result of rising sea levels, 
coastal erosion, changes in sea surface temperature, and increased flooding. The re-
port also identifies the importance of human pressures and behavior in shaping the 
vulnerability and adaptive capacity of coastal regions. Given NOAA’s coastal science 
and management mandates, the agency has a key role to play in supporting adapt-
ive capacity of communities and ecosystems in coastal regions. 

Numerous NOAA offices and programs involved in coastal efforts are actively con-
sidering the implications of climate for their stakeholder communities and partners, 
and several have initiated or are expanding existing courses of action to address the 
issue.  NOAA  recently  convened  a  highly  successful  workshop  on  Climate  Science 
and  Services:  Coastal  Applications  for  Decision  Making  through  Sea  Grant  Exten-
sion and Outreach in Charleston, South Carolina (April 10–12, 2007). The workshop 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

formation products local communities and managers need? 

Answer. There are several NOAA programs that provide climate information and 
products  to  local  communities  and  managers.  One  example  of  a  program  that  dem-
onstrates  how  NOAA  operationalizes  climate  change  science  to  provide  these  infor-
mation  products  is  the  Regional  Integrated  Sciences  and  Assessments  (RISA)  pro-
gram.  The  RISA  program  supports  integrated  place-based  research  across  a  range 
of social, natural, and physical science disciplines to expand the options of decision-
makers in the face of climate change and variability at the regional level. The RISA 
program  does  this  in  a  manner  that  is  cognizant  of  the  context  within  which  deci-
sionmakers  function,  and  the  constraints  they  face  in  managing  their  climate-sen-
sitive resources. 

RISA  teams  are  comprised  of  researchers  from  the  physical,  natural,  engineering 
and social sciences who work together and partner with stakeholders in a region to 
determine how climate impacts key resources and how climate information could aid 
in  decisionmaking  and  planning  for  those  stakeholders.  This  effort  often  includes 
analyses of adaptation options in the face of a varying and changing climate. 

32 

marks  an  important  step  in  the  development  of  an  expanded  partnership  among 
NOAA’s climate and coastal programs in an effort to provide enhanced support and 
services for national, state, and local constituencies concerned with coastal resource 
management and planning in the face of a dynamic climate system. Another exam-
ple  is  the  efforts  of  NOAA’s  Office  of  Ocean  and  Coastal  Resource  Management, 
which  over  the  past  year  has  been  working  in  partnership  with  the  Coastal  States 
Organization  in  leading  a  visioning  exercise  involving  coastal  managers  and  stake-
holders  on  the  future  direction  of  coastal  zone  management.  By  far,  the  foremost 
topic  among  emerging  issues  identified  at  the  visioning  forums  has  been  the  need 
to  anticipate  the  impacts  of  climate  change  through  enhanced  technical  assistance, 
planning and management. 

Question 2a. How can we operationalize climate change science to provide the in-

Because  RISA  teams  conduct  research,  assessments  (e.g.,  develop  white  papers, 
newsletters, and/or seasonal outlooks) and stakeholder interactions (e.g., workshops, 
focus  groups,  extension  activities)  on  a  continual  basis,  they  are  being  called  upon 
more  and  more  to  act  as  a  bridge  for  bringing  climate  impact  information  to  deci-
sionmakers. These teams also work with the climate services networks within their 
region, such as, state climatologists, National Weather Service offices, Regional Cli-
mate  Centers,  and  other  Federal  agencies  working  on  climate  impact  information. 
Topics covered by individual RISA’s depend on regional interests. Examples include: 
agriculture,  wildland  fire,  water  resources,  drought  planning,  fisheries,  public 
health, coastal climate impacts, and transportation. 

Another  example  of  a  program  that  provides  climate  information  and  products  to 
local  communities  and  managers  is  the  Climate  Dynamics  and  Experimental  Pre-
diction  (CDEP)  Program.  The  CDEP  program  supports  NOAA’s  efforts  to  improve 
global  climate  predictions  on  seasonal  to  interannual  timescales,  and  brings  the 
science  of  climate  forecasting  into  policy  and  decisionmaking.  In  particular,  NOAA 
plans to improve its operational intraseasonal to seasonal drought and climate fore-
cast capability by using ensembles of multiple state-of-the-art coupled climate mod-
els  to  better  quantify  forecast  uncertainties  and  reduce  forecast  errors.  NOAA  also 
plans  to  increase  the  scope  and  applicability  of  its  operational  climate  forecasts  by 
developing  new  and  improved  drought  forecast  products  to  meet  the  needs  of  deci-
sionmakers. 

Another example is the National Integrated Drought Information System (NIDIS). 
NOAA’s  vision  for  NIDIS  is  a  comprehensive,  user-friendly,  web  accessible  system 
to serve the needs of policy and decisionmakers at all levels concerned with drought 
preparedness,  mitigation,  and  relief/recovery.  Water  resource  managers,  ranchers, 
farmers,  hydropower  authorities,  municipalities  and  state  agencies  will  have  more 
comprehensive and timely information to inform their decisions regarding allocation 
of  water,  or  planting  and  purchasing  feed  for  livestock.  NIDIS  is  supported  by 
NOAA’s  current  operational  drought  monitoring  and  outlook  products  and  NOAA’s 
applied  climate  research.  In  June  2007,  the  NIDIS  Implementation  Plan  was  pub-
lished,  which  outlines  the  governance  structure,  priorities,  and  operational  require-
ments needed to meet the objectives of the program. 

The Transition of Research Applications to Climate Services (TRACS) Program is 
another program designed to operationalize climate change science. The TRACS pro-
gram  supports  the  transition  of  well-developed  research  and  prototype  products, 
processes  and  policy  tools  that  will  expand  the  use  of  climate  information  by  re-
gional decisionmakers (e.g., private sector, agriculture, state and local government). 
The  TRACS  program  seeks  not  only  to  support  the  implementation  of  these  transi-
tions, but also to learn from users how we can better accomplish technology transi-
tion  in  the  future,  for  public  goods  applications  and  improved  risk  management. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

TRACS  works  with  universities,  NOAA  laboratories  and  operational  units,  and 
stakeholder groups. 

33 

Question  3.  While  reducing  emissions  of  CO2 to  ensure  that  climate  change  re-
mains  in  check  is  an  incredibly  important  effort,  the  fact  remains  that  climate 
change is already happening. Our local managers need to have the tools to cope and 
adapt  in  the  face  of  the  changes  we’re  seeing  and  are  likely  to  see.  Admiral,  are 
NOAA managers factoring climate change into their management strategies in order 
to ensure species remain resilient and able to adapt? 

Answer.  NOAA  is  both  the  Nation’s  climate  information  provider  and  also  a  con-
sumer  of  that  information,  with  respect  to  managing  the  effects  of  climate  change 
in  marine  and  coastal  environments.  Resource  managers  at  the  Federal  level  are 
now beginning to factor climate change into their management strategies and plan-
ning.  In  addition,  through  partnerships  with  NOAA,  state  and  local  resource  man-
agers are being provided with the information needed to do the same. 

NOAA’s Coral Reef Conservation Program provides a variety of tools and informa-
tion to help NOAA and other managers incorporate climate change as a factor when 
developing  management  strategies  to  promote  resilient  coral  reef  ecosystems. 
NOAA’s  Coral  Reef  Watch  program  provides  reef  managers  and  others  around  the 
world with near real-time warnings of coral bleaching events. These warnings allow 
managers  to  mobilize  targeted  monitoring  efforts  to  assess  impacts  and  identify 
areas  of  high  resilience  to  bleaching  events,  keep  users  and  the  public  informed  of 
reef  conditions,  and  take  management  action  to  reduce  other  stressors  on  the  reef. 
In  2006,  NOAA  and  its  partners  produced  A  Reef  Manager’s  Guide  to  Coral 
Bleaching, which articulates the state of knowledge on the causes and consequences 
of  coral  bleaching,  provides  information  on  responding  to  mass  bleaching  events, 
and  highlights  how  to  develop  bleaching  response  plans  and  other  management 
strategies.  The  guide  helps  reef  managers  increase  the  resilience  of  coral  reefs  and 
related ecosystems to expected changes in the global climate system. NOAA and its 
partners  are  conducting  trainings  for  coral  reef  managers  on  use  of  the  guide  in 
2007–2008. In addition, coral reef managers in Hawaii, Guam and American Samoa 
have  developed  Local  Action  Strategies  to  address  impacts  of  climate  change  on 
coral  reef  ecosystems  as  part  of  a  U.S.  Coral  Reef  Task  Force  initiative.  NOAA  is 
helping  to  support  implementation  of  these  plans  and  development  of  similar  plans 
in other U.S. coral reef regions. 

With assistance from the Federal Coastal Zone Management (CZM) Program, sev-
eral state CZM programs have already undertaken initiatives to identify and adapt 
to climate change and sea level rise. Among those initiatives: 

• The  Maryland  CZM  Program  (MCZMP)  has  developed  a  Sea  Level  Rise  Re-
sponse  Strategy  for  the  state  of  Maryland,  acquired  high  resolution  elevation 
data  for  coastal  areas,  and  funded  a  state-wide  reassessment  of  shoreline 
change and erosion rates. The work of the MCZMP was instrumental in the de-
velopment and issuance of an Executive Order establishing a State Commission 
on Climate Change. The MCZMP is leading the State Commission’s Adaptation 
and  Response  Working  Group  that  will  develop  a  Comprehensive  Strategy  for 
Reducing Maryland’s Vulnerability to Climate Change. 
• The  San  Francisco  Bay  Conservation  and  Development  Commission  (BCDC)  is 
conducting a climate change study to identify the impacts of climate change, up-
date policies that may pertain to climate change effects, and organize a regional 
program  to  address  climate  change.  BCDC  is  working  with  the  NOAA  Climate 
Program’s  Regional  Integrated  Sciences  and  Assessments  Program  to  obtain 
data to develop maps of San Francisco showing the impacts of a one-meter rise 
in sea level. 
• The New Jersey Coastal Management Program is preparing guidance for estab-
• The North Carolina Division of Coastal Management has been an active partner 
with  the  NOAA  Ecological  Effects  of  Sea  Level  Rise  Research  Program.  The 
State  has  provided  invaluable  input  on  planning  the  pilot  project  for  North 
Carolina, designing the research, and the use of modeling tools. 

lishing buffers to allow wetlands to migrate in response to sea level rise. 

NOAA  also  has  the  Climate  Regimes  and  Ecosystems  Productivity  program  de-
signed to understand and predict the consequences of climate variability and change 
on  marine  ecosystems.  The  goal  of  the  program  is  to  develop  forecasts  of  changes 
in  fishery,  coastal,  and  coral  reef  resources  in  response  to  climatic  changes.  The 
forecasts  provide  users  and  managers  of  ocean  and  coastal  resources  information, 
such as the Fishery Management Councils and Coastal Zone Managers, the informa-
tion they require to adapt to changing climate regimes. Specifically, the program fo-
cuses on climate change and ecosystems in the North Pacific. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

34 

Presently,  the  only  U.S.  fishery  that  explicitly  uses  climate  data  in  its  manage-
ment  plan  is  the  Pacific  sardine.  For  this  fishery,  a  variable  fraction  of  the  popu-
lation  is  allowed  to  be  harvested  depending  on  the  average  ocean  temperature  for 
the  preceding  three  seasons.  This  management  approach  allows  more  of  the  stock 
to  be  harvested  when  conditions  are  conducive  to  high  sardine  productivity,  while 
less  is  harvested  when  conditions  are  less  conducive  to  sardine  productivity.  This 
management  strategy  thus  ensures  adequate  stock  size  for  reproduction  for  future 
years by factoring climate information into the management plan. 

A  number  of  NOAA’s  research  programs  have  begun  to  consider  how  climate 
change,  and  specifically  ocean  acidification  scenarios,  may  impact  other  regulated 
species—particularly  bivalve  mollusks,  crustaceans,  and  species  dependent  on  shal-
low-water  coral  reefs.  Over  50  percent  of  the  value  of  U.S.  fisheries  derives  from 
clams, scallops, and oysters, and various species of shrimp, crab, and lobster. These 
shellfish  are  thought  to  be  particularly  vulnerable  to  the  effects  of  reduced  levels 
of  calcium  carbonate  in  the  oceans  due  to  increasing  acidity.  NOAA’s  National  Ma-
rine  Fisheries  Service  has  initiated  a  few  pilot  studies  to  attempt  to  understand 
these impacts. 
Ocean Governance 

Question 1. In implementing the recommendations of the U.S. Ocean Action Plan, 
which  do  you  believe  is  the  larger  hurdle—obtaining  the  necessary  funding  for 
oceans  programs,  or  overcoming  the  inadequacies  of  our  current  system  of  ocean 
governance? 

Answer. The Administration responded to ocean governance issues with an Execu-
tive  Order  that  established,  within  the  White  House,  the  Committee  on  Ocean  Pol-
icy  and  mandated  coordination  among  Federal  agencies  including  coordination  and 
consultation  with  local  and  foreign  governments  and  the  private  sector.  The  Com-
mittee on Ocean Policy and its associated governance structure (including the Inter-
agency  Committee  on  Ocean  Science  and  Resource  Management  Integration,  the 
Subcommittee  on  Integrated  Management  of  Ocean  Resources,  and  the  Joint  Sub-
committee  on  Ocean  Science  and  Technology)  are  facilitating  the  development  and 
implementation  of  common  principles  and  goals  for  governmental  activities,  as  laid 
out in the U.S. Ocean Action Plan. The overarching goal is to improve the collection, 
development,  dissemination,  and  exchange  of  information  across  agencies,  and  re-
duce fragmented management and policy approaches. 

NOAA is requesting a total of $123 million in spending directly related to the U.S. 
Ocean Action Plan in the FY 2008 President’s Budget, including $60 million for en-
hanced ocean science and research, $38 million for protection and restoration of ma-
rine and coastal areas, and $25 million for sustainable use of ocean resources. 

NOAA believes these are bold steps in the right direction toward the intent of the 
U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy and the U.S. Ocean Action Plan. Ocean and coast-
al  governance  is  benefiting  from  more  systematic  collaboration  and  better  inter-
agency coordination across Federal agencies as a result of the Committee on Ocean 
Policy, and associated governance structure. 

Question  2.  The  Administration  has  suggested  an  organic  act  for  NOAA.  It  is  my 
understanding that NOAA’s responsibilities are spread out among over two hundred 
separate  statues.  Do  you  think  passage  of  an  organic  act  should  be  a  priority  for 
this  committee  and  for  Congress?  How  would  it  help  NOAA  better  accomplish  its 
mission of protecting and restoring our oceans and coasts? 

Answer. The U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy stated that Congress should ‘‘solid-
ify  NOAA’s  role  as  the  Nation’s  lead  civilian  ocean  agency  through  the  enactment 
of  a  NOAA  organic  act  that  codifies  the  agency’s  establishment  within  the  Depart-
ment  of  Commerce,  clarifies  its  mission,  and  strengthens  the  execution  of  its  func-
tions.’’  The  U.S.  Commission  on  Ocean  Policy  and  the  Administration,  as  stated  in 
the  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan,  agree  that  the  single  most  important  step  that  can  be 
taken  to  ensure  NOAA  meets  its  operational  goals  and  fulfills  mission  responsibil-
ities is the enactment of a NOAA Organic Act. We believe enactment of a broad or-
ganic act that provides basic agency-wide authorities would allow NOAA to more ef-
ficiently  conduct  the  activities  needed  to  meet  its  statutory  requirements.  The  Ad-
ministration  transmitted  a  NOAA  Organic  Act  to  Congress  in  2005,  and  has  plans 
to transmit a bill again in the 110th Congress. 
Weather Radar Coverage on the Northwest Coasts 

Question  1.  I  understand  from  Washington  state  fisherman  and  mariners  that 
there  is  little  useful  weather  radar  coverage  over  Northwest  coastal  waters.  Unfor-
tunately, in contrast to the rest of the country, this means that Northwest weather 
forecasters lack crucial information about dangerous weather features such as heavy 
precipitation  and  strong  winds.  Do  you  think  additional  radar  information  could 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

35 

help  improve  coastal  search  and  rescue  operations  in  that  region  and  potentially 
save lives? 

Answer.  The  radar  coverage  over  the  coastal  waters  off  and  along  the  Pacific 
Northwest  coast  was  improved  with  the  installation  of  the  Weather  Surveillance 
Radar-1988,  Doppler  (WSR–88D/NEXRAD)  network.  NOAA’s  National  Weather 
Service  (NWS)  weather  forecasters  use  data  from  several  sources  including  buoys, 
satellites,  surface  reports,  and  spotter  reports,  in  addition  to  weather  radar  data, 
to  prepare  weather  forecasts  and  warnings.  In  March  2005,  the  NWS  completed  a 
study  titled:  Objective  Methodology  and  Criteria  to  Assess  Requirements  for  Addi-
tional  Weather  Radars.  We  applied  this  methodology  to  the  west  coast  of  Wash-
ington and determined NWS has no requirement for an additional WSR–88D radar 
in western Washington. 

We  agree  with  the  recommendations  from  the  National  Research  Council  study 
Flash  Flood  Forecasting  over  Complex  Terrain:  With  an  Assessment  of  the  Sulphur 
Mountain  NEXRAD  in  Southern  California  (National  Academies  Press,  2005),  stat-
ing all available Federal radar data should be made accessible to the NWS, as well 
as local television station Doppler radars and operational radars from other organi-
zations.  The  study  recommends,  ‘‘The  NWS  should  consider  augmenting  the 
NEXRAD network with additional short-range radars to improve observation of low 
level  meteorological  information.’’  NOAA  is  addressing  these  recommendations  by 
accessing Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) Terminal Doppler Weather Radars 
(TDWR)  and  FAA  radars  supporting  air  traffic.  In  addition,  we  are  working  with 
the  University  of  Massachusetts  and  the  National  Science  Foundation’s  Center  for 
Collaborative  Adaptive  Sensing  of  the  Atmosphere  program  to  determine  the  feasi-
bility of integrating a number of small-scale Doppler radar technologies into our ob-
serving systems in the future. 

Question 2. I understand that offshore military operations would also greatly ben-
efit from this crucial weather information. As a former Navy Admiral, do you concur 
with this assessment? 

Answer.  The  Department  of  Defense  (DOD)  requirements  for  weather  radar  cov-
erage  along  the  Pacific  Northwest  coastal  waters  were  met  with  the  installation  of 
the original NEXRAD network installation. I am unaware of any new DOD require-
ments. 
Magnuson-Stevens Act Implementation 

Question 1. I’m concerned that NOAA does not have adequate resources budgeted 
to  meet  many  of  its  congressional  mandates.  In  particular,  I’m  concerned  about 
funding for implementation of the Magnuson-Stevens Act, which we passed just last 
year.  The  Congress  and  the  Administration  were  very  clear—Magnuson  was  sup-
posed to end overfishing in this country. NOAA requested $6.5 million for Magnuson 
Implementation  in  the  President’s  FY  2008  budget  request.  This  request  will  help 
initiate  the  implementation  of  MSA  but  is  nowhere  near  the  estimated  $70  million 
it will take to fully implement MSA requirements or the $348 million MSA author-
ized  for  FY  2008  alone.  We  have  a  long  way  to  go  on  this.  I  understand  that  ap-
proximately $1 million of the $6.5 million requested would be used to establish An-
nual Catch Limits, a key part of ensuring we don’t overfish. However, there are 530 
stocks  that  need  an  Annual  Catch  Limit  and  NMFS  currently  has  only  150  pre-
pared. 

Admiral,  what  is  your  plan  and  time-table  to  fully  implement  the  Magnuson-Ste-

Answer.  NOAA  has  developed  a  plan  and  time-table  to  implement  the  revised 
Magnuson-Stevens  Act.  The  plan’s  priorities  are  based  on  provisions  with  Congres-
sionally-mandated deadlines. 

Including: 
• Fishery  management  plans  meet  annual  catch  limit  requirements  (2010  and 

vens Act? 

2011) 

• Revise procedures for compliance with NEPA and MSA 2006 (Jan. 2008) 
• Establish  a  program  to  improve  the  data  currently  generated  by  the  Marine 

Recreational Fisheries Statistics Survey (Jan. 2009) 

• Submit the first international report and certification procedures for Illegal, Un-

regulated, and Unreported fisheries (Jan. 2009) 

• Establish a Bycatch Reduction Engineering Program (Jan. 2008) 
• Publish  guidelines  on  limited  access  program  referenda  for  New  England  and 

Gulf Councils (Jan. 2008). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

36 

The  Agency  provides  a  publicly-available  tracking  report  of  implementation 
progress.  This  report  shows  the  status  of  thirty  one  activities  required  under  the 
reauthorized Act. (http://www.nmfs.noaa.gov/msa2007/implementation.htm) 

Question 2. Do you have the resources you need to achieve this? 
Answer. To implement requirements of the reauthorized Magnuson-Stevens Fish-
ery  Conservation  and  Management  Act  (MSRA),  the  President  requested  an  in-
crease of $12.5M in his FY 2008 Budget. This included $6M to facilitate the develop-
ment of market-based approaches to fisheries management, and $6.5M to implement 
other  aspects  of  the  MSRA,  including  initiating  development  of  annual  catch  limits 
(ACLs),  improving  the  marine  recreational  fishery  survey,  reducing  illegal,  unregu-
lated,  and  unreported  fishing,  improving  the  scientific  review  process,  and  working 
on  the  Pacific  Whiting  Treaty.  NOAA  continually  evaluates  its  resource  require-
ments with the Administration through the budget process. 

In  FY  2007,  NMFS  spent  approximately  $360M  on  programs  authorized  by 
MSRA,  including  fisheries  research  and  management,  stock  assessments,  salmon 
management  activities,  survey  and  monitoring  of  habitat  and  fish  stocks,  grants  to 
Fishery Management Councils and states for fisheries management and research ac-
tivities,  efforts  to  reduce  bycatch,  law  enforcement  and  surveillance,  providing  fish-
eries observers and sustainable habitat management. 

Question  3.  How  do  you  expect  to  establish  Annual  Catch  Limits  for  530  fish 
stocks when only about $1 million in this year’s budget will go toward accomplishing 
that? What is your time-table for establishing these Annual Catch Limits? 

Answer.  The  $1  million  identified  in  NOAA’s  funding  request  is  a  first  step  to-
ward establishing annual catch limits (ACLs). NOAA’s funding needs for ACLs will 
change  over  time.  How  these  needs  will  be  met  will  be  determined  in  the  context 
of  the  Administration’s  annual  budget  formulation  process.  ACLs  will  be  designed 
to  end  and  prevent  overfishing  in  the  Nation’s  fisheries.  Approximately  139  stocks 
currently  have  adequate  stock  assessment  data  with  which  to  establish  ACLs.  As 
resources become available or reprioritized, NOAA will continue to improve stock as-
sessment data and address ACLs for additional stocks. 

To  implement  effective  ACLs  by  2010  (for  stocks  subject  to  overfishing)  and  2011 
(for  all  other  stocks),  the  Agency  must  define  and  explain  the  statutory  provisions 
related  to  ACLs  and  accountability  measures  (AMs).  NOAA  solicited  public  com-
ments  to  identify  issues  to  consider  addressing  in  potential  guidance  on  ACLs  and 
AMs between February 14, 2007 and April 17, 2007. NOAA is currently considering 
these  comments  and  the  scope  of  issues  to  address  in  guidance  on  ACLs  and  AMs. 
NOAA is working on formal ACL guidance that will revise National Standard 1 and 
plans  to  have  proposed  and  final  rules  published  in  early  2008.  This  will  allow  the 
Regional  Fishery  Management  Councils  time  to  develop  fishery  management  plan 
(FMP)  amendments  or  proposed  regulations  and  time  for  NOAA  to  implement  the 
measures,  if  approved,  or  take  a  separate  action.  In  addition,  NOAA  is  also  in  the 
process  of  evaluating  current  FMPs  to  identify  fisheries  that  will  need  new  or  im-
proved  measures.  Last,  NOAA  plans  to  develop  technical  guidance  by  the  spring  of 
2008 for the Regional Fishery Management Councils and their Scientific and Statis-
tical  Committees  (SSCs)  to  use  as  they  implement  annual  processes  for  setting 
ACLs. 
Reduction of Funding for Marine Mammals 

Question  1.  In  the  FY  2008  President’s  budget,  funding  for  the  Marine  Mammal 
Initiative  is  terminated  and  marine  mammal  funding  in  the  Protected  Species  Re-
search and Management program is reduced by $991,000. Could you please describe 
the  specific  impact  that  these  reductions,  if  implemented,  would  have  on  existing 
NOAA marine mammal programs? 

Answer. The reduction of $991,000 to the Marine Mammals line refers to the dif-
ference between the President’s Budget request for FY 2008 of $39,221,000, and the 
FY  2006  enacted  funding  level  of  $40,212,000.  The  net  decrease  is  the  result  of  a 
series of offsetting increases (such as the respread of the Alaska Composite and $1.0 
M  to  increase  the  North  Pacific  Southern  Resident  Orca)  and  the  termination  of 
Congressionally directed projects, including the Marine Mammal Initiative. 

The largest reduction in marine mammals is associated with unrequested funding 
which  has  been  used  for  the  Marine  Mammal  Initiative  (MMI)  which  has  provided 
for  marine  mammal  conservation  and  recovery  work  since  2005.  Congress  provided 
$9,856,134 in unrequested funding in FY 2005, and $4,931,204 in unrequested fund-
ing in FY 2006. NOAA has allocated $4,961,882 in FY 2007 for base activities such 
as  stranding  and  unusual  mortality  event  (UME)  response  coordination;  collection 
and  analysis  of  samples  from  Strandings/UMEs;  stock  assessments;  and  Take  Re-
duction Team activities. This funding supports the highest priority needs of the ma-
rine mammal program. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

Tsunamis 

37 

Question  1.  In  your  opinion,  where  are  the  most  vulnerable  gaps  in  our  tsunami 

warning system as it currently stands? 

Answer. The FY 2008 budget request continues the Administration’s commitment 
to  strengthen  the  U.S.  Tsunami  Warning  Program.  While  the  overarching  focus  of 
this  larger  effort  embraces  the  three  integrated  components  of  the  National  Tsu-
nami Hazard Mitigation Program (improving tsunami warning guidance, improving 
tsunami  hazard  assessment,  improving  tsunami  mitigation),  NOAA’s  initial  efforts 
in  strengthening  the  U.S.  Tsunami  Warning  Program  have  been  on  improving  tsu-
nami  warning  guidance.  This  has  included  expanding  NOAA’s  DART  station  net-
work, expanding and upgrading NOAA’s sea-level reporting network, expanding and 
upgrading  NOAA’s  seismic  networks,  and  upgrading  the  operations  of  NOAA’s  two 
Tsunami  Warning  Centers  to  24/7  operations.  While  NOAA  has  also  expanded  and 
accelerated  its  tsunami  inundation,  mapping,  modeling  and  forecast  efforts  as  well 
as  its  TsunamiReady  and  tsunami  preparedness  programs,  the  number  of  at-risk 
communities justifies continued involvement in these important areas, as requested 
in the President’s FY08 budget. 

Question  2.  I’m  pleased  to  see  the  Administration  following  through  on  the  $37.5 
million  pledge  to  get  the  Nation  moving  in  the  right  direction  with  respect  to  tsu-
nami preparedness. What have the last several years of funding bought us in terms 
of preparedness? I’m wondering if you can give specific examples of how these funds 
have been spent to reduce the risk to human life from tsunamis. 

Answer. Since FY 2005, NOAA has made dramatic improvements in its efforts to 
strengthen the U.S. Tsunami Warning Program. As of July 31, 2007, 32 operational 
Deep-ocean  Assessment  and  Reporting  of  Tsunami  (DART)  stations  have  been  de-
ployed,  with  seven  more  to  be  deployed  by  March  31,  2008.  There  are  now  42 
TsunamiReady communities, up from 11 at the beginning of 2005. We completed 17 
of  75  tsunami  inundation  mapping  and  forecast  models,  with  nine  more  to  be  com-
pleted by the end of this fiscal year. 

For FY 2008 NOAA is requesting $23.2 million to continue strengthening the U.S. 
Tsunami  Warning  Program.  With  this  request,  we  will  achieve  full  operating  capa-
bility in FY 2008. The FY 2008 Budget Request supports funding to: 

• Complete the deployment of the planned 39 DART Station Network; 
• Continue  NOAA’s  tsunami  inundation  mapping,  modeling,  and  forecast  efforts, 
by  completing  9  additional  models  (for  a  total  of  35)  of  75  planned  tsunami  in-
undation mapping and forecast models; 
• Continue  NOAA’s  tsunami  education/outreach  activities,  including  support  for 
• Continue 24/7 Operations at the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center and the West 
• Continue funding for the National Tsunami Hazard Mitigation Program. 
Question  2a.  Where  are  we  in  our  efforts  at  evacuation  and  emergency  prepared-

NOAA’s TsunamiReady program, for all U.S. communities at risk; 

Coast/Alaska Tsunami Warning Center; and 

ness preparation? 

Answer.  Since  the  December  2004  Indian  Ocean  tsunami,  NOAA  has  been  work-
ing  with  its  partners  to  identify  at-risk  coastal  communities  and  accelerate  and  ex-
pand  its  tsunami  community  preparedness  activities,  including  the  TsunamiReady 
program.  A  key  element  driving  the  success  of  this  program  is  the  willingness  of 
the  at-risk  coastal  communities  to  voluntarily  participate  in  the  program.  NOAA  is 
committed to working with each at-risk coastal community to ensure that they, and 
their  emergency  management  officials,  fully  understand  the  tsunami  hazard  and 
take  appropriate  preparedness  actions.  These  actions  include  a  well-designed  tsu-
nami emergency response plan. NOAA’s goal is to recognize all at-risk coastal com-
munities as ‘‘TsunamiReady’’ communities. 
Law of the Sea 

Question  1.  The  President  recently  stressed  the  importance  of  accession  to  the 
U.N.  Convention  on  the  Law  of  the  Sea  as  one  of  your  top  ten  priorities.  You  cite 
the  global  nature  of  addressing  the  declining  health  of  our  oceans,  as  well  as  the 
need  for  the  U.S.  to  assert  international  leadership  and  enhance  our  own  security 
and economic needs. The U.S. Navy and the Coast Guard have testified that joining 
the convention will strengthen our freedom of navigation, and all major U.S. indus-
tries  support  accession  to  the  convention.  Can  you  please  tell  us,  from  the  NOAA 
perspective whether you believe the Senate should act on this important treaty? 

Answer. NOAA strongly supports favorable Senate action on U.S. accession to the 
Law  of  the  Sea  Convention  during  this  session  of  Congress.  Accession  is  a  key  pri-
ority  of  the  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  and  just  this  past  May,  the  President  issued 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

38 

a statement urging the Senate to approve the Convention.1 Accession to the Conven-
tion is important to NOAA because it provides the basic legal framework for marine 
protection and utilization. 

Question  2.  Is  the  Administration  fully  implementing  our  rights  under  UNCLOS 

to protect our coastal and ocean resources? 

Answer. Since 1983 it has been official U.S. policy, as stated by President Reagan, 
to  recognize  and  abide  by  the  all  of  the  provisions  of  the  Convention  except  for  the 
deep  seabed  mining  provisions.2 However,  until  the  U.S.  accedes,  we  cannot  fully 
implement  the  rights  afforded  Convention  parties  to  protect  our  coastal  and  ocean 
resources.  For  example,  as  a  non-party,  we  do  not  have  access  to  the  Commission 
on the Limits of the Continental Shelf and cannot maximize the legal certainty con-
cerning  the  outer  limit  of  the  U.S.  continental  shelf  beyond  200  nm  from  the  base-
line (commonly termed the ‘‘extended continental shelf’’). 

The U.S. extended continental shelf is estimated to be among the world’s largest, 
encompassing thousands of square miles of seabed and subsoil. It is difficult to esti-
mate the value of the area because research to date has been extremely limited and 
the  values  of  the  resources  are  subject  to  market  fluctuations.  However,  a  2000 
study estimated that the global value of the non-living resources in all the offshore 
areas  that  may  be  claimed  by  coastal  states  at  $11,934  trillion  (at  2001  raw  com-
modity  prices).3)  Beyond  non-living  resources,  a  variety  of  sedentary  species  hold 
commercial and ecosystem values. Until the U.S. accedes to the Convention, our ex-
clusive sovereign rights to manage the natural resources of the extended continental 
shelf would be open to challenge. 

As a non-party, our ability at international fora to influence other countries to be 
as  protective  of  shared  living  marine  resources  (e.g.,  straddling  fish  stocks)  is  lim-
ited. 

Question  3.  If  not,  what  are  some  of  the  additional  measures,  from  NOAA’s  per-

cy does? 

spective, that should be taken? 

Answer. To conserve and manage its ocean and coastal resources, the U.S. should 
accede  to  the  Convention  during  this  session  of  Congress.  In  addition,  Congress 
should  fully  fund  the  President’s  FY  2008  budget  request  to  allow  NOAA,  in  co-
operation with the State Department and other Federal agencies, to collect and ana-
lyze all relevant data, and to prepare the necessary documentation, to establish the 
outer  limit  of  the  U.S.  extended  continental  shelf  in  accordance  with  international 
law. 

Question 4. What impact would that have on NOAA and the work that your agen-

Answer.  Accession  to  the  Convention  would  allow  NOAA  to  fully  implement,  af-
firm,  and  codify  U.S.  rights  to  sustainably  manage  living  marine  resources  in  our 
Exclusive Economic Zone and on our continental shelf, conduct marine scientific re-
search,  and  support  mining  of  the  deep  seabed  by  U.S.  industry.  Accession  would 
also  enhance  NOAA’s  ability  to  persuade  other  coastal  nations  to  better  conserve 
and  manage  their  natural  resources  and  protect  the  marine  environment  across  a 
wide range of international programs and engagements it carries out. 
Federal  Columbia  River  Power  System  (FCRPS)  Biological  Opinion  (BiOp) 
Question  1.  Last  month  the  Federal  agencies  in  the  ongoing  Columbia  River 
Power System BiOp remand in Judge Redden’s Court in Oregon submitted their lat-
est Proposed Action to recover salmon and steelhead in the Federal Columbia River 
Power System. This Proposed Action is the result of well over a year of collaboration 
among  Federal  agencies,  states,  and  tribes,  which  began  in  October  2005  when 
Judge Redden directed NOAA to revise the 2004 BiOp. When NOAA submitted the 
2004  BiOp  to  Judge  Redden,  it  did  so  without  involving  the  sovereigns  and  used  a 
completely new approach that was a surprise to all the parties. That is when Judge 
Redden  directed  NOAA  to  work  collaboratively  with  the  sovereigns  to  achieve  re-
gional  consensus  and  using  the  best  available  science  in  revising  the  2004  BiOp. 

1 ‘‘President’s  Statement  on  Advancing  U.S.  Interests  in  the  World’s  Oceans’’  (May  15,  2007) 

available at http://www.whitehouse.gov/news/releases/2007/05/20070515-2.html. 

2 The United States’ concerns with the Convention’s deep seabed mining provisions were sub-
sequently  addressed  by  an  agreement  concluded  in  1994  that  modified  the  objectionable  provi-
sions  governing  seabed  mining.  The  United  States  was  actively  involved  in  the  negotiation  of 
this  agreement  (the  Agreement  Relating  to  the  Implementation  of  UNCLOS  Part  XI),  and 
signed it in July 1994. 

3 Murton,  B.J.,  Parson,  L.M.,  Hunter,  P.  and  Miles,  P.R.  Global  Non-Living  Resources  on  the 
Extended Continental Shelf: Prospects at the year 2000. Proceedings of the Meeting on Non-Liv-
ing Marine Resources Beyond 200 Nautical Miles. International Seabed Authority Technical Re-
port No. 1. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

39 

With  this  current  Proposed  Action,  what  is  NOAA’s  plan  to  continue  to  coordinate 
with the sovereigns and the collaborative Policy Working Group in putting the 2007 
BiOp  together  to  achieve  regional  consensus  and  using  the  best  available  science? 
Answer.  NOAA  will  continue  to  coordinate  and  collaborate  with  the  sovereigns 
and  the  Policy  Working  group  through  the  completion  of  the  BiOp.  In  August  the 
FCRPS agencies will submit their Biological Assessment and a comprehensive anal-
ysis  that  will  further  describe  their  proposed  Reasonable  and  Prudent  Alternative 
(RPA).  The  August  version  will  be  a  refinement  of  that  submitted  to  the  court  and 
parties in May 2007, reflecting the results of further collaboration with the region’s 
sovereigns.  NOAA’s  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service  contributed  significantly  to 
this ongoing sovereign collaborative process through which the Federal agencies are 
developing their proposed RPA for the FCRPS. In writing our biological opinion, we 
will  follow  the  proposed  RPA  and  utilize  the  same  analytical  methods  developed  in 
the sovereign collaborative process to evaluate the effects of the RPA on the affected 
salmon and steelhead. On October 31, 2007, we will provide the sovereigns and Pol-
icy  Working  Group  a  draft  biological  opinion  for  their  consideration  and  comment 
to further inform our final biological opinion. 

Question  2.  NOAA  and  the  Federal  agencies  have  been  working  for  nearly  10 
years  to  craft  a  plan  for  operating  the  Federal  Columbia  River  Power  System  that 
will  also  recover  endangered  salmon  and  steelhead.  The  courts  have  struck  down 
past plans that were inadequate and there have been many delays in crafting a via-
ble plan. In the recent status conference in the ongoing BiOp remand, Judge Redden 
gave the agencies an October 31, 2007 deadline for issuing a BiOp that has regional 
consensus  and  is  based  on  the  best  available  science.  What  is  NOAA’s  plan  to  en-
sure  that  there  is  adequate  staffing  in  place  to  achieve  the  October  31  deadline 
without any further delays? 

Answer. The Court-ordered October 31 deadline is for NOAA’s issuance of a draft 
biological  opinion  which  will  mark  the  beginning  of  a  comment  period  for  regional 
sovereigns  and  parties  to  the  litigation.  A  deadline  for  issuance  of  a  final  biological 
opinion will be set by the Court after the draft biological opinion is available. NOAA 
is committed to meeting the court’s deadline. Compliance with Judge Redden’s order 
is a priority, and resources will be found, even if other activities are delayed. A sig-
nificant  number  of  staff  are  currently  assigned  to  this  effort  and  using  Fiscal  Year 
2007 FCRPS Biological Opinion funding we have contracted with additional support 
staff that will assist with document organization, editing and data management. 

Question  3.  In  the  BiOp  remand,  Judge  Redden  directed  NOAA  to  conduct  a  life- 
cycle  analysis  for  each  endangered  fish  species  that  considers  all  4  ‘‘H’s’’—Hydro, 
Habitat,  Hatchery,  and  Harvest.  Since  NOAA  is  conducting  a  life  cycle  analysis  for 
the  Columbia  River  Power  System  2007  BiOp,  what  implication  does  this  have  for 
other  BiOps?  Is  NOAA  going  to  use  the  same  life  cycle  analysis  for  the  ‘‘harvest’’ 
BiOp in the U.S. v. Oregon BiOp, which is due in December? 

Answer.  Whenever  NOAA  issues  a  biological  opinion,  including  those  for  harvest 
actions,  it  must  take  into  account  the  current  status  of  the  threatened  or  endan-
gered  salmon  and  steelhead.  NOAA  must  determine  how  that  status  has  been  af-
fected  by  future  actions  that  have  already  been  found,  in  an  ESA  consultation,  to 
satisfy  the  ESA  standards  of  avoiding  jeopardy  and  adverse  modification  of  critical 
habitat. Thus, the effect of the FCRPS RPA will become the baseline for future Fed-
eral  actions  in  the  same  area,  such  as  U.S.  v.  Oregon,  after  NOAA  completes  its 
ESA  consultation.  An  equally  important  factor  for  NOAA  is  the  judicial  interpreta-
tion of the ESA and its application. Thus, future biological opinions will conform to 
the  decisions  of  the  Ninth  Circuit  Court  of  Appeals  in  the  NWF  v.  NMFS  and  re-
lated litigation, affirming Judge Redden’s decisions. 

Question  4.  Earlier  this  month,  Seattle  Federal  Judge  John  Coughenour  issued  a 
ruling that flatly rejected the idea that if enough salmon can be produced in hatch-
eries, then there is little need to protect wild stocks. Judge John Coughenour ruled 
that  the  Endangered  Species  Act  has  a  ‘‘central  purpose  of  preserving  and  pro-
moting self-sustaining natural populations.’’ What are the implications of this ruling 
on the hatchery portion of the Columbia River Power System 2007 BiOp? 

Answer. The ruling from Judge Coughenour emphasized the intent of the ESA to 
protect naturally self-sustaining salmonid populations and the habitats they rely on. 
While the challenge was to a listing decision and not a biological opinion, the judge’s 
ruling is consistent with NOAA’s past application of the ESA, including the analysis 
of biological effects of proposed actions, and development of biological opinions. 

NOAA’s National Marine Fisheries Service has never suggested, in a listing deci-
sion  or  a  biological  opinion,  that  ‘‘if  enough  salmon  can  be  produced  in  hatcheries, 
then  there  is  little  need  to  protect  wild  stocks.’’  In  his  Order,  Judge  Coughenour 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

40 

stated  in  part:  ‘‘NMFS  has  interpreted  the  ESA  to  focus  on  the  protection  and  pro-
motion of naturally self-sustaining populations. . . .’’ (ORDER at 29) 

The  ruling  in  this  case  set  aside  NOAA’s  Hatchery  Listing  Policy  and  reinstated 
the  endangered  listing  of  Upper  Columbia  steelhead.  The  holding  in  this  case  per-
tains  to  the  listing  process  described  in  Section  4  of  the  Endangered  Species  Act. 
As  such,  it  does  not  directly  affect  biological  opinions  described  in  Section  7(a)(2). 
NOAA  intends  to  continue  using  the  best  available  science  regarding  hatcheries, 
including  their  effects  on  natural  populations,  in  the  FCRPS  Biological  Opinion. 
NOAA  will  draw  on  the  work  of  the  Hatchery  Science  Review  Group  (HSRG),  the 
technical recovery teams, and other technical experts to assess the effect of the pro-
posed  action  on  listed  species.  The  proposed  action  includes  hydropower,  habitat, 
hatchery  and  harvest  elements  and  NOAA’s  biological  opinion  will  evaluate  the  ef-
fects of all of those elements on each of the thirteen listed species in the Basin. 
Salmon Recovery in the Pacific Northwest (in general) 

Question 1. I understand NOAA is continuing to work hard to develop salmon re-
covery  plans  for  the  Columbia  River  Basin.  These  recovery  plans  serve  as  founda-
tions  for  Federal  agency  BiOps  and  blueprints  for  recovering  endangered  salmon 
and  steelhead  basin-wide.  To  help  achieve  this  goal,  I  have  worked  with  my  col-
leagues  to  ensure  that  the  Pacific  Coastal  Salmon  Recovery  Fund  is  sufficiently 
funded so that these plans will in fact recover endangered salmon and their habitat. 
What  is  the  schedule  for  getting  the  recovery  plans  done  in  the  Columbia  River 
Basin? 

Answer. Significant progress has in fact already been made in completing recovery 
plans  for  ESA  listed  salmon  and  steelhead.  The  Washington  portion  of  the  Lower 
Columbia  was  completed  in  2005.  The  recovery  plan  developed  under  Washington’s 
‘‘Shared  Strategy’’  for  Puget  Sound  was  completed  in  December  2006.  The  Hood 
Canal chum recovery plan was completed in May 2007. 

Question  1a.  How  is  NOAA  going  to  oversee  the  implementation  of  these  plans 

when they are going to be executed by multiple parties? 

Answer.  The  current  schedule  for  additional  recovery  plan  completion  is  as  fol-

lows: 

• Upper Columbia Chinook and steelhead plan: Fall 2007. 
• Snake River plans: Early 2008. 
• Mid Columbia steelhead plan: Summer 2008 
• Entire  Lower  Columbia  (incorporating  the  already-completed  Washington  plan 
• Willamette plan: Late 2008. 
Question  1b.  How  is  NOAA  going  to  oversee  the  implementation  of  these  plans 

with Oregon’s plan): Summer of 2008. 

when they are going to be executed by multiple parties? 

Answer. The ESA statute directs NOAA Fisheries to ‘‘develop and implement’’ re-
covery  plans.  Most  plans  are  multi-‘‘H’’  in  scope,  addressing  impacts  of  habitat 
changes,  hatchery  management,  harvest  and  the  region’s  hydro  system.  Also,  most 
plans  were  developed  locally  to  ensure  local,  state  and  tribal  participation  and  to 
enhance  buy-in.  As  a  result,  there  is  considerable  pride-of-ownership  in  the  plans 
completed  to  date  and  high  expectations  that  they  will  be  implemented  by  the  ap-
propriate agencies. 

NOAA’s  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service  has  two  fundamental  obligations  for 
implementing  ESA  recovery.  The  first  is  to  promote  recovery,  which  will  entail  the 
use  of  recovery  plans  to  inform  regulatory  and  non-regulatory  mechanisms.  While 
the recovery plans are not regulatory documents, they do provide the best available 
science on recovery goals, viability criteria, limiting factors, threats, and priority ac-
tions.  The  plans  will  guide  NOAA  Restoration  actions  through  the  Pacific  Coastal 
Salmon  Recovery  Fund  and  NOAA  Restoration  Center  and  will  also  be  used  to  im-
plement  actions  by  other  agencies,  state  and  local  governments,  local  organizations 
and tribes. NOAA will use the plans to communicate information about recovery at 
regional  and  local  scales  and  to  use  recovery  information  when  implementing  our 
responsibilities  and  additional  mandates  to  provide  for  sustainable  fisheries  and 
meet our treaty and trust obligations to the tribes. 

NOAA’s  second  fundamental  obligation  is  to  measure  progress  toward  recovery 
under  ESA  sections  4f  and  4g.  Meeting  this  obligation  requires  knowing  the  status 
of  listed  fish,  the  threats  that  endanger  them,  and  the  progress  of  actions  under-
taken  to  assist  recovery.  This,  in  turn,  requires  us  to  assume  a  leadership  role  in 
developing  and  coordinating  cost  effective  research,  monitoring,  evaluation  (RME), 
adaptive  management,  and  reporting  processes.  Perhaps  the  most  important  use  of 
these  results  will  be  in  making  decisions  pertaining  to  the  species’  listed  status. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

41 

These  results  will  be  provided  periodically  to  the  Administration,  Congress,  and 
public through 5 year status reviews, biennial reports, and other mechanisms. 

The  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service’s  Northwest  Regional  Office  assigned  its 
staff  to  geographically  based  teams  in  order  to  aid  local  recovery  planning  efforts. 
We will continue to work with the NOAA Fisheries Science Center and local teams 
to  integrate  recovery  implementation  and  RME  programs  with  the  region’s  regu-
latory and non-regulatory activities. 

Question 1c. What is NOAA’s plan to ensure that its salmon recovery policies are 

in line with the funding levels of the Pacific Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund? 

Answer. NOAA has consistently worked to align PCSRF funding with West Coast 
salmon recovery. The Administration’s budget request over the past 3 years has con-
tained language designed to target additional resources toward recovery of ESA list-
ed  salmon  populations  and  their  habitat  and  to  support  tribal  treaty  rights.  Con-
gress has not enacted this language. Under the terms of the Revised Continuing Ap-
propriations  Resolution,  2007,  NOAA  was  able  to  apply  additional  resources  to  the 
above priorities and better align funding with recovery needs. Absent Congressional 
direction,  NOAA  will  continue  to  apply  resources  to  high  priority  needs  based  on 
competitive grant applications. Once grants are awarded, recipients are encouraged 
to  increase  the  amount  of  effort  targeted  at  addressing  those  factors  that  are  lim-
iting the recovery of ESA listed salmon. 

Question  2.  The  Pacific  Coast  Salmon  Recovery  Fund  provides  grants  funding  to 
western states and tribes to assist state, local, and tribal efforts to conserve and re-
cover  Pacific  salmon  and  their  habitat.  The  Fund  is  being  used  to  make  significant 
progress  in  protecting  and  restoring  these  important  species  of  fish,  which  are  crit-
ical to the economic, ecological, and cultural well being of the Pacific Northwest. Be-
tween its establishment in 2000 and 2005, average appropriations for the Fund were 
about  $87  million  per  year.  In  FY  2006,  despite  Senate  efforts  to  ensure  that  the 
Pacific Coast Salmon Recovery Fund included appropriations above historical levels 
at $90 million, the final appropriation for the Fund was cut to $66.5 million. In your 
testimony,  you  indicated  that  Congress,  despite  Senate  efforts  to  the  contrary,  and 
not  the  Administration  chose  to  impose  the  recent  funding  cuts  to  drop  the  Fund 
below historical appropriation levels. Yet, in FY 2007 and FY 2008, the Administra-
tion  has  not  requested  to  restore  the  Fund  to  historical  levels,  requesting  only  $67 
million  for  each  fiscal  year.  Whereas  in  those  fiscal  years,  the  Senate  restored  the 
Fund to historical appropriation levels at $90 million. Does the Administration sup-
port the historical average appropriation level for the Pacific Coast Salmon Recovery 
Fund at or above $87 million per year? 

Answer.  The  Administration  has  not  supported  funding  PCSRF  at  its  historical 
average  of  $87  million.  In  FY  2007  and  2008,  NOAA  has  requested  $67  million  in 
the  Pacific  Coastal  Salmon  Recovery  Fund,  which  is  consistent  with  the  FY  2006 
enacted  level.  NOAA’s  requests  for  PCSRF  funds  have  proposed  language  to  dis-
tribute funding based on the priorities of ESA salmon recovery, tribal treaty rights, 
and habitat protection and restoration to ensure the funds are used for projects that 
will  provide  most  return  on  investment.  The  Administration  believes  that  NOAA 
can achieve the same gains for the recovery of listed pacific salmon at the requested 
level of $67 million rather than at the historical average of $87 million, if resources 
were targeted to priority areas of salmon recovery. 

Question  2a.  What  salmon  recovery  and  restoration  work  is  not  being  done  due 
to  Pacific  Coast  Salmon  Recovery  Fund  appropriation  levels  below  their  historical 
average? 

Answer.  The  Administration’s  budget  request  for  PCSRF  does  not  define  a  dis-
tribution  of  funds  among  the  eligible  states  or  tribes.  In  FY  2006,  funds  available 
for  ESA  listed  salmon  recovery  work  were  reduced  for  the  states  of  OR,  CA,  and 
ID and the tribes through Congressional direction. The Administration believes that 
NOAA  can  achieve  the  same  gains  for  the  recovery  of  listed  pacific  salmon  at  the 
requested level of $66.8 million rather than at the historical average of $87 million, 
if  resources  were  targeted  to  priority  areas  of  salmon  recovery.  As  such,  with  the 
funds available in FY 2007, funding was allocated to work that supported the three 
priority  areas  for  recovery  and  NOAA  expects  an  increase  in  the  efficiency  of  the 
program to address ESA salmon recovery with the funds provided. 
Enhancing Stewardship 

Question 1. Highlight the elements within your agency’s 2008 budget request that 
address the U.S. Commission on Ocean Policy’s research priorities of enhancing the 
stewardship  of  natural  and  cultural  ocean  resources  and  improving  ecosystem 
health. In particular, please address the following: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

• Explain  how  this  effort  will  enable  the  management  of  West  Coast  groundfish 

stocks to move toward a more ecosystem-based approach. 

42 

Answer.  NOAA’s  Ecosystem  Approach  to  Management  (EAM)  has  been  encour-
aged by the Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Reauthoriza-
tion  Act  of  2006  (16  U.S.C.  1882,  § 406  f(1–2)),  the  U.S.  Ocean  Action  Plan  (2004) 
and An Ocean Blueprint for the 21st Century (2004). In response, NOAA’s FY08 re-
quest includes $5M for the Comparative Analysis of Marine Ecosystem Organization 
(CAMEO)  program,  a  priority  of  the  Administration’s  Ocean  Research  Priorities 
Plan.  CAMEO  will  support  the  development  of  advanced  marine  ecosystem  models 
as  well  as  research  to  improve  the  effectiveness  of  marine  protected  areas  (MPAs) 
as  management  tools.  While  the  program  will  be  national  in  scope,  it  is  likely  that 
some resources will be directed to research that will help to advance ecosystem ap-
proaches to management in the California Current ecosystem. 

West Coast groundfish comprise a diverse assemblage of more then 80 species uti-
lizing  a  wide  range  of  habitats  in  the  California  Current  ecosystem.  Conditions  in 
this ecosystem are strongly driven by climate, which is known to have a significant 
influence on the survival and productivity of several species, and is suspected to in-
fluence the biology of many other commercial, recreational and forage species. Given 
the highly dynamic features of the ecosystem, it is widely recognized that improved 
data  and  models  are  needed  to  improve  further  the  management  of  West  Coast 
groundfish. 

Recently, NOAA Fisheries has initiated pilot projects that will be important to an 
ecosystem-based approach to management. These efforts include testing of advanced 
technology for surveying habitat not accessible to conventional survey methods; com-
pilation  of  coast-wide  marine  habitat  data  into  a  dynamic,  web-based  system  that 
allows overlay of habitat with biological data; initiating development of a California 
Current  scale  ecosystem  model;  and  initiating  the  inclusion  of  ecosystem  consider-
ations  into  selected  stock  assessments  of  groundfish  species.  These  are  some  of  the 
key  needs  to  move  toward  and  implement  an  ecosystem  approach  to  management. 
The  requested  FY08  funds  will  allow  the  pilot  projects  to  continue  at  their  current 
pilot level. 

Question 1a. Highlight budget elements that support greater state and tribal par-

ticipation in the stewardship of natural and cultural ocean resources. 

Answer.  NOAA  has  several  programs  working  with  states.  The  Office  of  Ocean 
and  Coastal  Resource  Management  (OCRM)  conducts  the  Coastal  and  Estuarine 
Land  Conservation  Program  (CELCP)  to  provide  states  with  grants  to  preserve 
many  important  coastal  and  estuarine  lands.  OCRM  also  implements  the  Coastal 
Zone  Management  Act  in  coordination  with  states,  and  partners  with  states  in  de-
veloping  the  National  Estuarine  Research  Reserve  System  (NERRS),  which  has  27 
reserves  across  the  Nation.  The  National  Marine  Sanctuaries  program  collaborates 
with  states  on  sanctuary  designation  and  management.  The  National  Centers  for 
Coastal  Ocean  Science  have  labs  in  several  states  and  fund  extramural  research  at 
academic  institutions  to  address  important  state  coastal  issues  such  as  harmful 
algal  blooms  and  coral  conservations  research.  In  addition  NOAA  is  developing  a 
National  Height  Modernization  program  to  fund  the  establishment  of  accurate  geo-
detic positioning in states. Accurate geodetic provides for safe and efficient transpor-
tation  and  commerce,  understanding  climate  change  and  mitigating  damage  from 
coastal  storms  by  measuring  and  monitoring  sea  level  rise,  information  to  enable 
emergency response deciders to plan for and respond to natural disasters. 

NOAA’s  National  Ocean  Service  (NOS)  works  closely  with  tribes  on  stewardship 
of natural and cultural ocean resources through the National Marine Sanctuary Pro-
gram, the Office of Ocean and Coastal Resource Management, the Office of Response 
and Restoration, and the National Centers for Coastal Ocean Science. 
National Marine Sanctuary Program: 

The  Olympic  Coast  National  Marine  Sanctuary  (OCNMS)  signed  a  Memorandum 
of  Agreement  with  the  state  of  Washington  and  four  coastal  tribes—the  Makah 
Tribe,  Hoh  Tribe,  Quileute  Tribe  and  the  Quinault  Nation—in  January  2007,  cre-
ating  an  Intergovernmental  Policy  Council.  The  Intergovernmental  Policy  Council’s 
goal  is  to  bring  together  state,  Federal,  and  tribal  governments  in  a  forum  for  effi-
cient communication and discussion of the management of marine resources and ac-
tivities  within  the  boundaries  of  the  OCNMS.  The  OCNMS  supports  tribal  cultural 
activities  such  as  an  annual  tribal  canoe  journey  and  tribal  festivals  with  vessel 
support and educational and outreach programming. 

The  Channel  Islands  National  Marine  Sanctuary  (CINMS)  works  in  partnership 
with  a  variety  of  Chumash  Indian  people  and  some  Chumash  organizations  to  ac-
complish projects of mutual interest, such as canoe (tomol) voyages and development 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

43 

of a documentary film about the sanctuary. CINMS has created a non-governmental 
Chumash  Community  seat  on  its  Sanctuary  Advisory  Council,  reflecting  its  policy 
that  the  Chumash  people  are  important  advisers  to  the  sanctuary  and  deserve  a 
seat at the table. 
Office of Ocean and Coastal Resource Management (OCRM): 

The  OCRM  Marine  Protected  Area  (MPA)  Center  works  with  tribes  to  develop  a 
national system of MPAs as directed by Executive Order 13158. This involves notifi-
cation of all federally-recognized tribes on key milestones associated with the devel-
opment  of  the  MPA  system,  and  active  outreach  to  tribes  in  the  Pacific  Northwest 
and  Great  Lakes  responsible  for  co-management  of  marine  and  Great  Lakes  re-
sources. 

Over  the  years,  OCRM  has  coordinated  with  numerous  tribes  on  Coastal  Zone 
Management Act (CZMA) Federal consistency issues between states and Tribes, and 
has mediated CZMA disputes between tribes and states. 
Office of Response and Restoration: 

• NOAA’s Damage Assessment, Remediation, and Restoration Program (a collabo-
rative program among the Office of Response and Restoration, the National Ma-
rine Fisheries Service Restoration Center, and NOAA General Counsel for Nat-
ural  Resources)  maintains  ongoing  partnerships  with  numerous  tribal  govern-
ments. As natural resource trustee agencies under the authorities granted them 
by  the  Comprehensive  Environmental  Response,  Compensation,  and  Liability 
Act and the Oil Pollution Act, NOAA and tribes collaborate to evaluate and re-
solve liability for injury to natural resources from releases of oil and hazardous 
substances, and also from vessel groundings in National Marine Sanctuaries. In 
addition,  we  work  together  to  oversee  restoration  of  natural  resources.  Particu-
larly  in  the  Western  United  States,  where  treaties  have  established  the  rights 
of tribes to use their traditional fishing grounds, NOAA and tribes have mutual 
interests to protect and restore natural resources in coastal areas. 

National Centers for Coastal Ocean Science: 

The National Centers for Coastal Ocean Science have several projects that involve 

Tribal communities and/or resources. Projects include: 

• Creating  an  Approach  to  Utilizing  Traditional  and  Local  Ecological  Knowledge 
in  Resource  Management  (AK—Native  Village  of  Port  Graham  &  the  Chugach 
Regional Resources Commission) engages native communities to help document 
their traditional knowledge of the coastal environment. 

• The  National  Status  and  Trends  Mussel  Watch  Program  worked  with  the  sec-
ond  chief  (James  Kvasnikoff)  of  Nanwalek,  AK  to  collect  mussels  for  an  ex-
panded Mussel Watch Project in Alaska and specifically to sample and analyze 
marine food items that are used by subsistence fisherman. 

• Monitoring  Domoic  Acid  in  Marine  Food  Webs  and  Water  to  develop  sensitive, 
cost  effective  detection  methods  for  domoic  acid  (DA),  the  toxin  produced  by 
harmful  diatoms.  One  goal  of  the  research  is,  ultimately,  to  transfer  the  tech-
nology to local tribes and state health officials. 

• Olympic Region Harmful Algal Bloom (ORHAB) Project is investigating the ori-
gins  of  harmful  algal  blooms  off  the  Olympic  Coast  of  Washington  State.  The 
ORHAB  project  brings  knowledge  to  the  local  communities  on  the  Olympic  pe-
ninsula  of  the  Washington  coast,  empowering  local  tribes  and  state  managers 
to  make  scientifically-based  decisions  about  managing  and  mitigating  harmful 
algal bloom impacts on coastal fishery resources. 

NOAA Corps 

Question. The Hydrographic Services Improvement Act of 1998, as amended, con-
tains language authorizing up to 299 officers in the NOAA Corps. Given the increas-
ing  demands  on  the  NOAA  Corps,  is  this  level  sufficient  for  meeting  NOAA’s  oper-
ational needs well into the future? 

Answer.  In  FY  2007,  under  the  present  authorization  of  299  officers,  NOAA  will 
be  able  to  meet  operational  needs  into  the  near  future.  Beyond  that,  future  NOAA 
Corps  staffing  needs  are  dependent  on  the  size  of  the  fleet,  the  ratio  of  officers  in 
shore-based  billets  to  sea/air  billets,  and  the  Corps  ability  to  respond  to  national 
emergencies such as hurricane response and recovery, man-made disasters, etc. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

44 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

VICE ADMIRAL CONRAD C. LAUTENBACHER, JR. 

Question  1.  As  the  result  of  the  2006  re-scoping  of  the  National  Polar-orbiting 
Operational Environmental Satellite System, 7 of the sensors needed for monitoring 
essential  climate  variables  were  either  ‘‘de-manifested’’  entirely  or  will  be  used  at 
decreased  capacity  levels.  A  report  to  the  White  House  Office  of  Science  and  Tech-
nology Policy by senior scientists at NOAA and NASA spelled out in detail how this 
rescoping  will  undermine  our  future  monitoring  of  climate  change,  sea-level  rise, 
and  other  essential  related  variables.  This  problem  was  raised  at  a  hearing  on  cli-
mate  science  held  by  this  committee  on  February  7  of  this  year.  Admiral 
Lautenbacher,  the  administration  did  not  request  funds  in  the  FY2008  budget  to 
rectify this situation. You have not committed to developing the needed sensors, in-
cluding  the  solar  irradiance  sensor  (TSIS),  the  Earth  radiation  budget  sensor 
(ERBS) and the Ocean Altimeter sensor (ALT). How do you justify this decision? 

Answer.  NOAA  remains  committed  to  its  responsibilities  to  develop  and  imple-
ment a robust climate program. The Office of Science and Technology Policy (OSTP) 
coordinated  a  joint  NOAA-National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration  study  to 
assess  the  impact  of  the  demanifested  sensors.  NOAA  and  NASA  are  preparing  a 
mitigation assessment for the Executive Office of the President. 

Question  2.  The  National  Research  Council  has  warned  that  the  Nation’s  long- 
term  satellite  monitoring  system  is  at  risk  of  ‘‘collapse.’’  Given  NOAA’s  role  in 
studying  climate  change,  are  you  concerned  about  the  state  of  our  current  satellite 
program? What steps would you take to strengthen it? 

Answer.  NOAA  has  a  continuous  planning  process  to  develop  its  next  generation 
satellites.  NOAA’s  plan  is  to  provide  uninterrupted  satellite  data  through  at  least 
2026 from the next generation geostationary satellites, known as the Geostationary 
Operational  Environmental  Satellite  R-Series  (GOES–R),  and  the  next  generation 
polar-orbiting satellites, known as the National Polar-orbiting Operational Environ-
mental  Satellite  System  (NPOESS).  Through  the  NPOESS  and  GOES–R  systems, 
NOAA has been working closely with the National Aeronautics and Space Adminis-
tration (NASA) and, where applicable, the U.S. Air Force to satisfy requirements of 
the National Weather Service, National Ocean Service, and the NOAA Climate Pro-
gram. 

In  response  to  a  request  from  the  White  House  Office  of  Science  and  Technology 
Policy  (OSTP),  NOAA  has  been  working  with  NASA  to  identify  options  to  mitigate 
the  loss  of  climate  sensors  from  the  Nunn-McCurdy-certified  NPOESS  program. 
NOAA  and  NASA  requested  assistance  from  the  National  Research  Council  (NRC) 
Space Studies Board to assess the state of Earth observations, including the impact 
of  the  2006  changes  to  the  GOES-R  and  NPOESS  programs.  A  special  NRC  group 
of experts has assessed the impact on climate monitoring capability of the NPOESS 
Nunn-McCurdy  certified  program.  NOAA  and  NASA  are  preparing  a  mitigation  as-
sessment for the Executive Office of the President. 

Question 3. In real dollars, the Federal research budget for climate change science 
has  fallen  since  the  mid-1990s.  In  your  opinion,  have  these  budget  cuts  decreased 
the  ability  of  Federal  climate  scientists  to  do  their  jobs?  Does  NOAA  need  more 
money to adequately understand climate change risks? 

Answer.  The  President’s  Budget  Requests  for  NOAA,  in  both  FY  2007  and  FY 
2008,  have  included  program  increases  for  climate-related  activities.  NOAA  has  a 
diverse mission ranging from managing fisheries to predicting severe weather to in-
creasing  our  understanding  of  the  Earth’s  climate.  The  Administration’s  requests 
over  the  past  several  years  have  focused  on  a  balanced  set  of  priorities  to  sustain 
NOAA’s core mission services and address its highest priority program needs. 

NOAA continues to move forward with research to better understand the risks as-
sociated with climate change. Some examples of NOAA’s recent contributions to cli-
mate change science are as follows: 

• NOAA’s  climate  scientists  have  continued  to  make  substantial  contributions  to 
our understanding of the Earth’s climate and climate change. The expertise and 
contributions  of  NOAA  climate  scientists  were  evident  in  the  recent  Intergov-
ernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  4th  Assessment  Report.  NOAA  scientists 
made valuable contributions to the reports of both Working Group I (The Phys-
ical  Science  Basis)  and  Working  Group  II  (Impacts,  Adaptation  and  Vulner-
ability)  reports.  NOAA  climate  scientists  co-chaired  a  report  and  coauthored 
chapters,  and  NOAA-sponsored  research  made  enormous  contributions  to  the 
assessment. 
• NOAA  led  the  2006  International  Ozone  Assessment,  which  tracked  the  out-
comes  of  the  Montreal  Protocol  and  indicated  the  protocol  is  working.  For  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

45 

first time, the assessment shows that ozone depleting substances in the atmos-
phere have decreased. 
• NOAA  also  released  the  National  Integrated  Drought  Information  System 
(NIDIS)  Implementation  Plan:  A  Pathway  for  National  Resilience  in  hardcopy 
in  June  2007.  NIDIS  will  enable  users  to  determine  the  risks  associated  with 
drought  and  provide  supporting  data  and  tools  to  inform  drought  mitigation. 
The Plan describes how accessible and usable drought information will be devel-
oped,  deployed,  and  utilized  to  facilitate  informed  decisionmaking  by  resource 
managers and others. 

Question  4.  The  effectiveness  of  fisheries  management  depends  in  large  part  on 
having reliable and accurate data on the resource. NOAA has for 25 years conducted 
a  survey  of  sea  scallop  abundance  throughout  the  range  of  the  fishery.  That  data 
set  is  extremely  valuable  to  the  management  process,  particularly  given  the  dura-
tion and continuity of the survey. 

The research vessel at the New England Fisheries Science Center in Woods Hole, 
MA,  the  ALBATROSS,  has  been  the  platform  used  to  conduct  the  scallop  survey. 
The  ALBATROSS  is  about  to  be  replaced  by  the  new  research  vessel,  the 
BIGELOW.  NOAA  has  indicated  that  they  have  no  plans  to  continue  the  scallop 
survey on the BIGELOW once the ALBATROSS is retired. 

The continuation of this survey is extremely important to the continued health of 
this  important  fishery,  which  is  valued  at  $500  million  in  direct  landings,  and 
makes about a $2 billion total contribution to the economy. Will NOAA continue the 
survey once the ALBATROSS is retired? 

Answer.  The  Northeast  Fisheries  Science  Center  intends  to  maintain  the  25-year 
survey  time  series  for  Atlantic  sea  scallops.  We  have  a  plan  that  addresses  the  re-
tirement  of  the  R/V  ALBATROSS  IV  and  the  transition  to  a  replacement  survey 
platform.  In  2008,  the  R/V  ALBATROSS  IV  and  her  survey  scallop  dredge  will  be 
inter-calibrated with a program-funded charter vessel, either a UNOLS (University- 
National Oceanographic Laboratory System) research vessel or a commercial fishing 
vessel, along with a new improved scallop dredge designed with industry advice. In 
2009  and  subsequent  years,  we  will  support  the  sea  scallop  time  series  with  a  pro-
gram-chartered vessel and the newly calibrated survey dredge. 

Question  5.  I  am  concerned  about  the  erosion  of  the  budget  for  Stellwagen  Bank 
National  Marine  Sanctuary  over  the  past  several  years.  The  condition  report  re-
leased earlier this year finds that habitat quality is degrading in the Sanctuary and 
recommends  a  series  of  management  actions  to  improve  water  quality  and  habitat 
conditions.  The  declining  budget  since  2005  does  not  support  these  efforts.  How  do 
you  justify  this  budget  decline  in  the  face  of  degraded  conditions  in  the  Sanctuary? 
Answer.  Since  FY  2002,  the  Stellwagen  Bank  National  Marine  Sanctuary  has 
been  provided  $9.2  million.  In  FY  2005,  the  National  Marine  Sanctuary  Program 
(overall) was appropriated $50.3 million (in ORF) and in FY 2006, $35.1 million (in 
ORF). Funding for each site is based on the overall National Marine Sanctuary Pro-
gram appropriation. Thus, in FY 2005, $1.7 million was provided to the Stellwagen 
Bank National Marine Sanctuary and in FY 2006 $1.5 was provided. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BILL NELSON TO 

VICE ADMIRAL CONRAD C. LAUTENBACHER, JR. 

Harmful Algal Bloom and Hypoxia 

Question  1.  Last  year,  concerns  about  funding  for  harmful  algal  blooms  (HABs) 
research  were  a  high  priority  through  the  continuing  resolution.  Extramural,  com-
petitive  research  funds  were  requested  and  assurances  were  given  that  this  area 
would be a high priority. In fact discretionary funds were released from higher eche-
lons  of  NOAA  management  to  NOAA’s  National  Centers  for  Coastal  Ocean  Science 
(NCCOS) for this specific research subject. It has been brought to my attention that 
funds were then redirected away from its intended HAB research. If top leadership 
of  NOAA  is  receptive  to  concerns  on  certain  issues  and  dedicate  monies  from  the 
discretionary fund for this, and those funds meant for harmful algal bloom research 
are  then  diverted  within  National  Ocean  Service  and  NCCOS,  how  can  NOAA  top 
leadership  be  more  explicit  when  they  send  funds  down  the  line  with  specific  re-
search  intentions?  How  can  we  ensure  that  funds  meant  for  certain  research  areas 
in NCCOS are not reprogrammed away from this important national issue? 

Answer.  NOAA’s  FY  2008  President’s  Budget  Request  expresses  our  priorities. 
While  NOAA  agrees  that  harmful  algal  blooms  are  important,  we  must  be  able  to 
find  a  balance  among  all  NOAA’s  needs  and  requirements,  including  our  priorities 
in the Gulf of Mexico. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

46 

Question  2.  For  many  years  now  organizations,  universities,  research  institutes 
and  Members  of  Congress  have  been  concerned  with  the  funding  levels  of  Harmful 
Algal Blooms research. It is very difficult that the President’s budget is continually 
static at $15.8 million. This year the House and Senate reported Commerce, Justice 
and  Science  appropriations  bills  fund  HABs  research  at  $15  million  and  $17.5  mil-
lion respectively. With an understanding of the pressing need for research into this 
marine issue, how can you better exert your influence to regain numbers in this line 
item to where they were just a few years ago? 

Answer.  In  total,  we  expect  to  spend  approximately  $8.9  million  on  research  re-
lated  to  Harmful  Algal  Blooms  (HABs)  and  hypoxia.  This  $8.9  million  provides  the 
tools  necessary  for  managers  to  respond  and  predict  HAB  and  hypoxia  events  such 
as  those  affecting  the  New  England,  Florida,  Pacific  Northwest  and  California 
coasts,  as  well  as  the  Great  Lakes,  every  year.  HAB  and  hypoxia  events  threaten 
human  health,  kill  marine  animals,  impact  fisheries,  and  cost  millions  of  dollars 
each  year.  Multi-year  research  programs  in  New  England,  Florida,  the  Pacific 
Northwest  and  the  Great  Lakes  are  also  yielding  tools  and  forecasts  that  are  help-
ing  coastal  communities  to  mitigate  the  impacts  of  harmful  algal  bloom  in  these 
areas. 

For  example,  NOAA  has  developed  the  Gulf  of  Mexico  HAB  Bulletin,  which  pro-
duces  daily  information  and  twice  weekly  forecasts  that  are  used  to  determine  the 
current and future location and intensity of harmful algal blooms and the likely im-
pacts  to  the  environment.  An  addition  $5  million  is  also  requested  for  a  near-term 
priorities  project  in  Charting  the  Course  for  Ocean  Science  in  the  Next  Decade:  An 
Ocean  Research  Priorities  Plan  and  Implementation  Strategy  to  develop  sensors  for 
marine ecosystems. This effort will include work to develop in situ sensors for rapid 
detection of pathogens, harmful algae and their toxins in coastal areas. In addition, 
some  of  the  $5  million  requested  for  Gulf  of  Mexico  Partnerships  may  be  used  to 
support coastal communities in their efforts to address harmful algal blooms and hy-
poxia events through competitive grants. 
National Undersea Research Program 

Question 1. Undersea habitats have evolved from a time of testing if and how hu-
mans could live and work under the sea, to today where we can effectively use satu-
ration  diving  and  undersea  habitats  for  critical  ocean  science,  education,  and  tech-
nology testing. 

The  AQUARIUS  reef  base  program  in  Key  Largo,  Florida  is  a  unique  and  state- 
of-the-art  NOAA  facility  especially  well  suited  for  in  situ  experiments  on  climate 
change  impacts  on  coral  reefs,  sensor  development  and  testing  for  ocean  observing, 
long-term monitoring of coral reefs and to engage the public’s imagination and inter-
est. In situ experiments that can be done at AQUARIUS are critical if we are going 
to  understand  the  impacts  of  problems  such  as  climate  change,  ocean  acidification, 
coral reef decline, and ecological shifts in the ocean. 

Why has NOAA not taken better advantage of their assets at AQUARIUS to con-
duct  research  on  ocean  science  topics  that  are  critical  to  this  Nation,  such  as  the 
impact of climate change on reefs, sensor development and testing for ocean observ-
ing capabilities, or education? 

Answer.  NOAA  has  taken  advantage  of  the  AQUARIUS  facility  to  conduct  re-
search  on  ocean  science  topics  that  are  critical  to  the  nation,  in  balance  with  the 
other ocean research priorities. 

NOAA has operated the AQUARIUS undersea laboratory, located near Key Largo, 
Florida,  since  1987,  enabling  scientists  to  live  under  the  sea  and  conduct  valuable 
studies  that  have  contributed  to  our  understanding  of  coral  reefs  and  underwater 
dynamics. Recent additions of advanced information and communications technology 
has  enabled  the  AQUARIUS  to  provide  24/7  observing  capabilities  in  an  environ-
ment monitored by humans, and to reach students, scientists, and the public in real 
time, allowing virtual participation and observation of missions on-going at the lab-
oratory. 

The  AQUARIUS  now  has  an  expanded  network  of  cabled  and  non-cabled  observ-
ing  system  capabilities,  advanced  communications  capability,  deep  refill  stations, 
and  remote  vehicle  capabilities.  The  new  capabilities  have  enabled  the  AQUARIUS 
complex to meet a wide range of national needs, including coral studies and exciting 
education and outreach initiatives. In addition, NOAA works with the National Aer-
onautics and Space Administration (NASA) to provide the AQUARIUS to NASA for 
space analog training and testing missions. 

Question 2. In the proposed merge of Ocean Exploration and the National Under-
sea  Research  Program  what  will  be  the  balance  of  expeditionary  science  with  re-
search  that  is  focused  on  important  science  topics  along  our  coasts  from  field  sta-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

47 

tions,  e.g.,  in  Florida  on  topics  such  as  climate  change  and  reefs?  And  how  will  the 
balance be assured? 

Answer. The programs are being merged to enhance the linkage and effectiveness 

of NOAA’s undersea research and ocean exploration activities. 

The  balance  of  expeditionary  science  and  research  is  interdependent  and  will  be 
determined by the Office of Ocean Exploration and Research as advised by consulta-
tions within NOAA, with extramural NOAA partners, and with the NOAA’s Science 
Advisory  Board’s  Ocean  Exploration  Advisory  Working  Group.  A  Strategic  Concept 
of  Operations  has  already  been  developed  for  the  merged  Office  of  Ocean  Explo-
ration and Research which describes the functions and priorities of the new organi-
zation  as  exploration;  advanced  technology  development;  research  to  support  both 
including  focused  research  on  extreme  and  unique  environments,  continental  shelf 
ecosystems,  new  ocean  resources,  and  ocean  dynamics;  operations  in  support  of  ex-
ploration  and  technology  development;  and  education,  outreach,  and  data  manage-
ment.  These  priorities  are  based  on  national  priorities  identified  in  the  Joint  Sub-
committee  on  Ocean  Science  and  Technology’s  Charting  the  Course  for  Ocean 
Science  in  the  Next  Decade:  An  Ocean  Research  Priorities  Plan  and  Implementation 
Strategy, the NOAA 5-year Research Plan, the NOAA Strategic Plan, and NOAA 20- 
year  Research  Vision.  In  order  to  increase  the  focus  of  investment  in  these  areas, 
some  research  areas  previously  supported  by  the  National  Undersea  Research  Pro-
gram  that  are  well  addressed  in  other  NOAA  program  areas  (i.e.,  climate,  corals) 
will be de-emphasized. 
National Windhazard Reduction Program 

Question  1.  In  October  of  2004  Pub.  L.  108–360  was  signed  into  law  creating  the 
National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program  (NWIRP),  creating  a  first  time  au-
thorization for NOAA, NIST, FEMA and the NSF to undertake an interagency effort 
to  coordinate  Federal  wind  hazard  programs  and  also  to  empanel  a  group  of  11  to 
15  non-Federal  wind-hazard  experts  and  interests  to  consult  with  the  interagency 
group. The 3 main responsibilities of the interagency group are to improve meteoro-
logical  understanding  of  windstorms,  measure  windstorm  impact  and  identify  and 
promote  cost-effective  measures  to  reduce  windstorm  impact.  Is  this  a  reasonably 
correct summary of the NWIRP? 

Answer. Yes. 
Question  2.  A  similar  interagency  coordination  program,  focused  on  earthquakes, 
known  as  the  National  Earthquake  Hazard  Reduction  Program  (NEHRP)  has  been 
in operation since about 1977, correct? 

Answer. The National Earthquake Hazards Reduction Program (NEHRP) was es-
tablished  by  the  U.S.  Congress  when  it  passed  the  Earthquake  Hazards  Reduction 
Act  of  1977.  At  the  time  of  its  creation,  Congress’s  stated  purpose  for  NEHRP  was 
‘‘to  reduce  the  risks  of  life  and  property  from  future  earthquakes  in  the  United 
States  through  the  establishment  and  maintenance  of  an  effective  earthquake  haz-
ards  reduction  program.’’  Since  NEHRP’s  creation,  it  has  become  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment’s  coordinated  long-term  nationwide  program  to  reduce  risks  to  life  and 
property in the United States that result from earthquakes. 

Question 3. Are you sufficiently familiar with the NEHRP program to venture an 
opinion about its utility and effectiveness in coordinating Federal agency science on 
earthquakes and earthquake mitigation, and the role of its public panel in advising 
the  agencies  and  disseminating  understandings  of  Federal  science  in  earthquake 
mitigation? 

Answer.  NOAA’s  expertise  and  responsibilities  does  not  extend  to  earthquake  re-
search  and  mitigation  and  we  defer  to  our  colleagues  at  the  National  Institute  for 
Standards and Technology (NIST) for an opinion on the NEHRP. 

Question  4.  Since  its  enactment  in  late  2004,  can  you  tell  me  roughly  how  much 

has been done to establish the NWIRP, which was fashioned after the NEHRP? 

Answer.  The  National  Science  and  Technology  Council  (NSTC)  established  a 
working  group  for  Wind  Hazard  Reduction  with  representatives  from  NOAA,  Na-
tional Science Foundation, National Institute for Standards and Technology, Federal 
Emergency  Management  Agency  (all  included  in  the  NWIRP  Act),  and  Federal 
Highway  Administration.  The  NSTC  completed  the  Windstorm  Impact  Implementa-
tion  Plan  within  the  first  year  (2005),  and  the  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Pro-
gram  Biennial  Progress  Report  for  Fiscal  Years  2005–2006  is  undergoing  inter-
agency review prior to being submitted to Congress. A representative from academia 
has also presented some ideas on needed research to the working group. 

Question 5. Since the enactment of NWIRP in 2004, what major hurricanes/wind-

storms have impacted the United States? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

48 

Answer. Between October 24, 2004, when the National Windstorm Impact Reduc-
tion Act of 2004 became law, and March 31, 2007—3,789 major hurricane/windstorm 
events have impacted the United States. Of these events, 48 were hurricane/typhoon 
events,  1,241  were  tornado  events,  and  2,500  were  high  wind  events.  These  totals 
include  all  hurricane  and  typhoon  events  of  Category  1  strength  or  greater  on  the 
Saffir-Simpson hurricane scale (winds 74 mph or greater), all tornado events greater 
than  F0  on  the  Fujita  Tornado  Damage  Scale  (winds  roughly  73  mph  or  greater), 
and high wind events of 74 mph or greater. 

This information was queried from NOAA’s Storm Data which is an official publi-
cation  of  NOAA.  Storm  Data  documents  the  occurrence  of  storms  and  other  signifi-
cant  weather  phenomena  having  sufficient  intensity  to  cause  loss  of  life,  injuries, 
significant  property  damage,  and/or  disruption  to  commerce.  Within  NOAA’s  Storm 
Data,  events  are  reported  on  a  per  county  or  forecast  area  basis,  which  means  for 
a hurricane/typhoon which passes through 4 counties there will be 4 separate event 
reports. This applies to tornadoes and wind events as well. 

Question  6.  I’ll  ask  you  whether  you  have  reviewed  the  report,  called  the  ‘‘Wind-
storm  Impact  Implementation  Plan’’,  which  was  issued  by  OSTP  after  the  particu-
larly devastating impact of Hurricanes Rita and Katrina? It observes that the focus 
on  understanding  and  predicting  of  windstorm  hazards  and  risks  by  any  one  Fed-
eral agency is ‘‘minimal’’ at this time, and makes recommendations on implementing 
a  plan  to  create  the  interagency  working  group  that  was  authorized.  Do  you  agree 
that  the  program  of  work  outlined  in  the  OSTP  plan  should  be  undertaken?  If  not, 
which of its recommendations do you suggest should be abandoned? Some may find 
it ironic that the combined spending authorization for the four principle agencies in 
the NWIRP is only just over $20 million. 

Answer.  As  a  member  of  the  interagency  working  group  for  wind  hazard  reduc-
tion,  NOAA  contributed  to  the  drafting  of  the  Windstorm  Impact  Implementation 
Plan  and  has  reviewed  the  completed  plan.  NOAA  agrees  that  the  aspects  of  the 
program  of  work  outlined  in  the  Windstorm  Impact  Implementation  Plan  that 
NOAA would have responsibility for should be undertaken; NOAA defers to the Na-
tional Institute for Standards and Technologies (NIST),the Federal Emergency Man-
agement  Agency,  and  the  National  Science  Foundation  to  comment  on  the  appro-
priateness  of  the  aspects  of  the  program  of  work  that  are  not  under  NOAA’s  pur-
view. 

NOAA supports a number of activities related to measuring and predicting wind-
storms and their impact and under the President’s FY08 request NOAA would con-
tinue to do so. Past work has included analyzing hurricane surface wind data using 
NOAA’s  H*WIND  product  to  the  State  of  Florida  for  their  Public  Hurricane  Loss 
Projection Model, public outreach and education on protecting oneself and structures 
against  high  wind  with  a  focus  on  tornados,  and  several  wind  resiliency  activities 
with  university  partners  including  education  on  building  codes  and  wind  resilient 
building.  NIST  includes  specific  funding  in  its  budget  for  the  National  Windstorm 
Impact Reduction Program and NOAA partners with NIST on windstorm reduction 
impact activities. 

Question  7.  Under  the  NWIRP  NOAA  is  authorized  to  undertake  approximately 
$2 million in work annually, correct? And would the agency do so if directed to use 
FY 2008 appropriations for that authorized work? 

Answer.  The  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Act  of  2004  provides  the  au-
thority  for  establishing  a  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Program  and 
NOAA  is  authorized  to  be  appropriated  $2.2  million  in  FY  2008  for  carrying  out 
such a program. 

If  NOAA  is  directed  in  enacted  FY  2008  appropriation  legislation  to  use  appro-
priated  funds  as  authorized  in  the  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction  Act  of 
2004, NOAA would comply. 

NOAA supports a number of activities related to measuring and predicting wind-
storms and their impact and under the President’s FY08 request NOAA would con-
tinue  to  do  so.  The  National  Institute  for  Standards  and  Technologies  (NIST)  in-
cludes  specific  funding  in  its  budget  for  the  National  Windstorm  Impact  Reduction 
Program  and  NOAA  partners  with  NIST  on  windstorm  reduction  impact  activities. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:46 Aug 29, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\75679.TXT JACKIE

